and one of wounds
Almost died.
in tears of my own making.
“He created hysterical headlines about "Muslim inbreeding " with his comments about the health risks of cousin marriages among Pakistanis. The way he spoke about the issue was as though some Frankenstein-like creatures were filling the baby wards in maternity hospitals around Oldham, Bradford, Burnley and Birmingham.”
And one more thing. That is completely unrelated to the rest of this post. I went to my first BodyPump class yesterday. Today I thought I'd need Jordan to wash my hair, but I was at one point able to lift my arms above my head. Now that it's late, that might no longer be possible. Despite the soreness, I really enjoyed the class. Thinking I'll be ready to go again on Saturday, if only there was someplace closer than Corpus Christi to take said class. Oh, the woes of small town life.
We decluttered. Depilated. Decompressed.
Shazam
When I originally saw this,
3) After much contemplating select a weather proof garment and team with a fetching pair of green wellington boots to create a new look that is both stylish and elegant.
Fellow Stanford Hospital ( USA )
When we exited, my parents were waiting for us, plus a glum-looking group who were likely waiting for a member of their family to receive a verdict. There was another mysterious man who sat on a bench the entire time, and was still there when we left the courthouse.
Can you imagine such a thing? She got the Most Awesome Friend Ever award from me that day. I still can't fathom how anyone can clean up a mess like that. Especially when it isn't even your child. I really am blessed to have the greatest friends on earth.
Nothing major has happened to warrant it before anyone asks. Dreams haven't been shattered; I haven't lost any manuscripts in a hard drive failure of doom; not even a rejection email has come my way!
I think children aged seven to eleven or twelve or so ARE at a golden age - I love doing talks to them, they are so enthusiastic and receptive and just generally fun - and I agree with Amanda and Lyn that there has been more than one Golden Age of books written for them. But listen for yourselves!
1151 **D-XI/1/1992. “The Pains and Pleasures of James Joyce’s Dubliners.” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Alpine Valley Lodge, East Troy, Wisconsin. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(12), above, pp. 504-13.)
Even he is quite content to do the watching from the livingroom rather than from the stadium. We've got our tickets to all of the Hawks' home games up for sale on the NFL Ticket Exchange. We're leaving it to Fate: if the tickets to a particular game don't sell, we'll go down to Qwest Field and shell out $20 for parking and cheer and listen to Blue Thunder and eat stadium food. So far, we haven't had the opportunity; our tickets have been selling nicely—we've made back almost half the cost of the season.
and they test me,
Among all the participating at the Challenge, someone will be drawn with the random system to win this sweet La-La Land Crafts "Sweet Dreams Marci".
I really like the fact that it asks the schools to develop the policies rather than it being a hand-down from central government, it hands the initiatives to schools.
Our country has become much too concerned with possession. David Walker, former Comptroller General and another member of the Miller Center Panel, summed it up. ”We are not discharging our stewardship responsibility.”
Good Beer Week kicks off on Monday May 15 and consists of events to suit every beer taste and budget. From tastings at Slowbeer and Purvis Beer to Beer Dinners at The Terminus Hotel and The Local Taphouse to The BeermenTV Hair of the Dog Breakfast and the Great Beer Debate at Ormond Hall and week-long special offers and surprises around town – there’s something to tempt all. Check it all out at www.goodbeerweek.com
Tenth Avenue Angel ... TCM ... 4:30 AM
The most exciting part of all this for me is the exhibition of original Norman Collins flash artwork, hand-painted by 'Sailor Jerry' himself, now fully restored and previously unseen in the UK.
We don't get it. But the thing is, we don't have to understand her need in order to respond to it. We just have to care that her need is met. That is pretty much the prime directive of unschooling.
Who the hell is Gruen, you might ask. Well, he’s the guy who’s always there when scenes begin and is long gone before they become stale.
Make no mistake: success can be elusive. The information, tools, methods and skills necessary to achieve it are moving targets. It helps to remember that success isn’t really a destination; it’s a journey. So let’s get started with some fundamental principles to start us moving in the right direction:
Is 61:10 I will greatly rejoice in the Lord, my soul shall be joyful in my God; for He has clothed me with the garments of salvation, He has covered me with the robe of righteousness, as a bridegroom decks Himself with ornaments, and as a bride adorns herself with jewels.
Have you guessed who it is yet? Does it look remotely like her?
What about all of the single black women in history (like Zora and countless others) who managed somehow to never be married? What about the fraught legal history of marriage among free and enslaved blacks, which weren’t recognized when we first got to America? Finally, how will it ever be possible for black women to become marriageable or even embrace their successes with the constant stream of crap that we get bombarded with about clocks ticking?
Reattached:
We have many different options when it comes to choosing your rug; there’s small rugs, big rugs, rectangular rugs, round rugs, shaggy rugs, smooth rugs and even glittery rugs for those you want an extra touch of glamour.
with the Trio, and equally important, with a translator and
PRESS RELEASE- AAMER ANWAR
Last week I traveled from Malaysia to Phoenix, Arizona to visit family. My cousin Billy Jean and I were at the Walking Stick Casino losing a few dollars, nice place but they don’t have any Craps tables. Anyway Billy Jean walks into the bathroom and goes into one of the stalls and does her business. When she leaves the stall she looks up and sees a wall of men standing at the urinals, she yelps and three men turn and pee on each other. She made a quick exit to tell me it was time to leave.
An important quote from the interview was, “You have to learn to lean into the pain of your fears and doubts,” he says. “We all have doubts. I consult with leaders all the time, and even the best at the highest level admit that they have insecurities; that there are places where they feel insecure.”
I don’t mind in the slightest. After taking yesterday off, and celebrating a bit with Mr. Steph, I’m looking forward to working it up a bit more before I set it aside to rest. Outlining triumphs again :)
Who’s to say whether yoga devotees will start feeling sore after being manipulated in that way? Analysts and investors won’t be the only ones asking whether Lululemon’s “cultivated scarcity” can last now that it’s competitors and its customers are waking up to the secrets at Lululemon’s core.
As I said above, the trailer for this film made me think it would be very much played for laughs like Shaun of the Dead was. While SotD had its mildly gruesome moments, it was hardly an exercise in grossing out the audience like other Zombie films.
* Light bulb* I’ll make a detailed itinerary.
Wishing you all a very Merry Christmas and wonderful New Year!!!!
wingman and his worst nightmare
Not very often maybe once a month I start phasing in an activity to replace one or two that the kids have become bored with. Because they are limited to one station a day and I have 12 stations they get to each of the stations 2x in a month so they last! So long are the days of changing math activities every week!
By all accounts, Garcia’s maiden voyage was a good one.
Distressink Ink I have used: Face-tattered rose ● Hair-brushed corduroy, walnut stain● Cloths- pumice stone, black soot, bundled sage● Edges distressed with weathered wood.
And we have books! Boy, do we have books! I hope you do too, wherever you are and however improvised your Christmas ends up being. May your Amazon parcels arrive on time, may you make it to your local indy and cheer up their seasonal; sales figures, and if you have an e-reader I hope it has been well-laden with titles before you travel.
First off the name is very unusual, I had assumed that it was anglicised German or something – not a bit of it, Cakebread is actually one of the oldest English surnames. Apparently of Norse-Viking and Olde English pre 9th century origins, it derives from the Norse ‘kaka’ meaning cake and the English ‘brede’, which is seemingly a baker of dainty cakes and loaves in medieval times – these were made from especially fine, sweet flour called ‘cakebread’. So, you see the finer things of life are right there in Bruce’s genes.
In any event, in light of Admiral Bume’s fine service to the Empire, I am resolved not to complain about his artillery exercises ever again. There are some discomforts one should bear for those who have done the rest of us such honor. It is, I daresay, the British way.
Although, one other possibility is out there, just to make us doubt ourselves (Jennie did like to be chased). Some biographies still claim that Jennie was born at 426 Henry, the home of Leonard’s brother Addison.
PS If you are heading in the direction of Greece feel free to mail me for my shopping list.....;-)
Sugarcubes Blue Eyed Pop IS
"The Bay?" I guessed.
Maybe next year:)
Lower the flame and add milk and mix well
I painted my guest bedroom when my sister was in town a month or so ago. I've been meaning to blog about it but I can't because it's the place I store things for upcoming clients. Here's proof things aren't always picture perfect.
I know that must seem like such a bizarre question, like this rough couple of weeks has turned me fully insane. Allow me to explain.
Fry, as a student of anthropology, has clearly forgotten one of the basic tenets of human sexuality, that men are here to screw as much as they can, and women to have babies, but of course, within that, there are a billion shades of sexuality - women who bloody love it, men who (literally) shrink away, and the same applies if you're gay. If you and your partner(s) can live with it, it's all acceptable. Methinks Mr Fry feels a little uncomfortable with sex, which isn't uncommon - I was told about a bloke who didn't like kissing during The Act, which I thought was a bit odd - but I wish Fry wouldn't use his own awkwardness to make women feel terrible.
My Dad is having the same surgery in the next couple weeks. Date TBD as of now. My had has had a couple heart attacks and is the owner of 7 stints in his heart. And his surgery too will scare and worry me just like Mom's. I'm just hoping and praying for another good outcome.
We had a full weekend together, with an extra day since school was closed. Wednesday mornings, this morning, I drop them off with their other parent.
and potato chips.
BECKHAM
King Solomon: Quiet, Mona. You will have your turn to speak! Lena, go on.
Aside from his firm foundation in Christianity Charles Stokes firmly believes as he says, “that math is the language of science”. For Charles mathematics adds up daily life’s operations and can demonstrate anything under the sun. Charles explained to me that one could use mathematics to solve almost any problem. He even claimed that kids could use mathematics to determine the difference between how they play basketball and how great players do it. I need Charles to figure out the next Lotto numbers.
1) Do you ever feel like giving up? What do you do to keep yourself from giving up?
Help me. Please, help me understand.
Faith and morals are harder, perhaps. An unquestioning knowledge that God exists and has his eye on you is hard for some modern writers to truly live inside, so they find it hard to make their readers live inside it too. And if you're to write convincingly historical worlds you can't just export our manners and ethics - our understanding of sexuality or asceticism, say - backwards in time, unchanged. But it's difficult to strike the balance between your need for your sixteenth-century pickpocket or duke to be believably honourable and upright in his way, while giving him the views about Jews or dogs or Catholics or Protestants which are at least verisimilar to the real thing: convincing, if not (strictly) authentic. Many good decent, honourable men, and plenty of their wives, thought that errant wives should be beaten, for example. But if you want your reader to actually like your good, decent honourable man, and still more understand why his wife regards being beaten as no more than an occupational hazard (as their children also do) then you've got even more of a problem of balance. And yes, there was another split infinitive in that last sentence. It's only the late Georgians and Victorians who decided that splitting infinitives was a crime... and that's another thing that we'll need to touch on in my workshop: how do you deal with things you know are right, but which run counter to everyone's perceptions of history. All the research in the world won't make your novel come alive if your reader's trust in you is shaken, because you've failed to keep them willing to believe you.
"Once good storage solutions and systems are in place, it’s so much easier for anyone, any age, to learn where things go. Even little kiddos. Labeling bins with pictures of what’s inside (rather than writing it out) makes it easy for kids to see where toys and crafts belong. Kids are quick learners, so cleaning up after themselves should come easy, especially once everything has a clear home."
I am not a brewer, so may be these comments are perfectly valid. My reasoning for thinking that these comments are invalid is that if it's so easy to make great one off beers, how do the vast majority of brewers fail. I suspect because it's not that easy. It marries well with the equally invalid arguement that it's easy to brew great beer if you never make the same beer twice. something else I've heard several times. My suggestion is that may be it's easy to brew great beer if you're a great brewer with great idea's. I rather think that has an awful lot to do with it.
But what draws us together is not those things but the result of them, and the result is a group of people who accept each other for who they are. We LOVE our differences from each other.
The x ray proved he was legendary
Can’t wait to see my sunny island
We are in a post-Constantinian or post-Christian age in the West. We need to act in light of this reality, not pretending to still have control over the political levers of powers to shape the culture. These kinds of political protests suggested by Pastor Steven makes as much sense as a group of Christian missionaries heading to Iraq and politically protesting some non-Christian cultural artifact.
8. Parks and Recreation
With that said, I will leave the blog-nation for now - I think this is going to be fun (and addictive).
For the things you do endear you to me
Playing Around: This tart is good made with pears. Make sure to pat them dry with paper towels before you lay them into the crust - pears are juicier than apples and their juices can slow the settling of the custard. When summer rolls around, the tart is good with peaches, which must be peeled, as well as apricots. If you use apricots, add 1/4 teaspoon pure almond extract to the custard - it will reinforce the fruit's flavor - and glaze the tart with apricot jam. With round fruits, like apricots and peaches, you can, if you'd like, forgo the slicing and just halve and pit the fruit, then lay the halves into the crust rounded side up.
This is such a plus for me, generally we find ourselves making do with American programs that are clearly not written with Australian children in mind. Skwirk is!
Sunday was about 86 degrees and not a cloud in sight. Pretty good for April right? Well lemme just tell ya how we celebrated....
I cut the recipe in half because I was only making for the two of us. While the salmon was broiling I gather the rest of the ingredients for the salad:
After all our work over the past weeks we're hoping to take a few day trips out before our first proper holiday of the year on 6th April, when we go on a coach trip for 4 days to the Severn Valley, which I'll tell you about when we get back.
Like every soap, the show was contingent upon secrets that would be revealed in seemingly endless two or three-character conversation scenes, but DS actually offered a payoff of sorts to these chat-filled encounters with the attacks by “cursed” characters and the weird incantations and rituals that became a part of the various storylines.
So, if you go for oysters and I go for ersters
I picture it being stuffed with wrappers of peppermints, along with peppermints yet to be unwrapped.
The topper, and the point where I ran into steering problems, was when Axelrod said that Mitt Romney has had the campaign arena all to himself, due to the fact that President Obama has been focused on his day job of running the country and hasn't had the time to campaign. That his campaign won't actually kick-off until early May!
32. (1) Before or after a person is accused of an offence under this Act, no matter likely to lead members of the public to identify a person as the complainant in relation to that accusation shall either be published in Trinidad and Tobago in a written publication available to the public or be broadcast in Trinidad and Tobago except where, on the application of the complainant, the Court directs that the effect
Dropped your ashes to separate me from you.
When he arrived, all he saw was a single light in a ground-floor window. He almost drove away, afraid, but something kept him there. He walked to the door and knocked. A frail elderly woman stood before him with her
I just logged on to my online dating profile and two seconds later I get an IM. “Hey sexy lady I was just wondering if you would be down for some casual fun with a younger guy?” WTF? I promptly logged right back off.
My sister and I have set a date for our yearly weekend away together - just the two of us- that we last had in 2007. Done. She is booking her flights tonight and we have decided on Byron Bay as a destination. There are a couple of girlfriends we would like to invite eventually but for now it will just be the two of us. Her and Me. Maybe when we get settled in a routine of taking our yearly get-together, well, yearly, then we might invite our gorgeous friends along. But for now it will just bet he two of us. Hanging out. Having walks. Laughing. Talking.Filling up those emotional petrol tanks. I am soooooo looking forward to it.
I had planned on doing some chair painting and flower bed sprucing up this weekend, but it rained off and on. Also, my stomach hurt yesterday, so I ended up laying in bed with the hubster watching movies and reading books...pretty amazing day if you ask me! To top it off the hubster even cleaned the house and cooked! I sure am a lucky girl!
Would that we could elect another LBJ. While I would not want to be personal friends with him, nor sit and drink a beer with him, he was a fantastic leader with courage, intellect, and great intelligence. My guess is he also knew the difference between North Korea and South Korea. President LBJ earns the HWA posthumously for having the vision and leadership to safeguard true democracy.
Article by: Frederick Stander CHT
eating: recently, it's been my green plant & berry banana smoothies. oh my yum. recipe coming soon!
Haven’t you heard? Hope is alive and waiting.
to fervent approval from his audience. Having worked in this area 30 years ago, I was thrilled to see this forward-looking initiative finally get rolling in my lifetime. Oh, but also... to see it completed...
END 1:01 P.M. EDT
(even though I love him and he means well)
Double loop start or magic ring
When faced with the notion of a second tour, the soldier's body language says one thing - what he actually does runs completely counter to that.
To be honest, I had an amazing summer, but I am so excited to be back at school. It's nice to be in the classroom with my students, to see those wide eyes as I explain some new grammar rule or the spelling of 'ancient'. Yes the noise of the summer breeze blowing while reading in my hammock is nice, but so is the noise of laughter from school children right outside your door.
Skip ahead three more years. Having now spent several summers at COTW, yet another Godly man delegated yet more responsibility to me. See, in addition to playing concerts, the music staff also served as waiters in the dining hall. Like most of the music staff, I really hadn’t wanted to do that, but I had taken to heart the summer staff’s “theme verse” from my first year there: Colossians 3:23. And so, I had decided to wait tables with all my heart as unto the Lord… whatever that meant.
Anushka is fantastic as always and has to be said, looks sensational. Though her role could do with more definition (and length – she needed to be drafted in much sooner!) Anushka powers above it all demonstrating star quality and making her presence felt, as well as doing more than the role demands - which is ideally what Ranveer should have done. The star of the show is undoubtedly Parineeti Chopra who steals nearly every scene she is in as the spoilt Daddy’s girl and carries off the role with such ease and confidence that she is more of an experienced actress than a debutante.
one Go-gurt pouch. (okay, MOST of what we eat doesn’t come out of a pouch.)
Personal-lines insurance rates were up 1 percent in April compared to the same month a year ago, according to MarketScout’s latest Market Barometer.
Illustration/Argumentation: I don’t think there is an illustration in the world that can accurately paint what God did for Israel. Such constant rebellion against God, offending him worse than adultery offends us. Yet God kept coming back and showing his love for Israel and always forgiving whenever forgiveness was requested. And that is a love that we might never really understand as long as we live on this Earth.
Open Letter:
The Nebula Awards pay particular attention to short fiction, with categories for novella, novelette and short story. The Ray Bradbury Award for Outstanding Screen Presentation mixes film and television, so Martin Scorcese’s 3-D “Hugo” (no relation to the Hugo science fiction awards) is going up against an episode of “Dr. Who” written by Neil Gaiman. In the running for the Andre Norton Award for Young Adult Science Fiction and Fantasy Book is Franny Billingsley’s “Chime,” which was a finalist for the National Book Award.
I finished Snuff in two days. Very glad I read it. It’s interesting how much Pratchett’s writing is changing just at the end of his career. That might be because of the Alzheimer’s, he’s writing with someone else and they are tightening his prose and keeping it more realistic – well as far as reality goes in a world sitting on top of elephants on the back of a giant turtle floating through space!
You were scoring goals for fun and tearing defences apart
Video clips :
Hubs: Let's have a date night tomorrow.
...of grocery shopping like my parents left my teenage self with food money and went on vacation. I'm an adult...my cart should NOT be filled with Pop Tarts, Chili Cheese Fritos and mini bagel dogs but alas. Sometimes, I'm actually embarrassed in front of the cashier and the people behind me in line and I strategically place all the fruits and veggies and meats at the end of the conveyor belt...the old top of mind awareness trick!
I’ve been keeping very busy with a number of different projects. I continue to do a lot of writing for Guns.com, both feature articles and reviews. Check it out!
If that was true in the first century, so much more is it true in the twenty first. Religion is dividing the world violently. Sadder still, according to 1 Timothy 4:1,
holloweyed hauntbeasts aglow with pale turquoise flame.
wedding band, Jame Avery
MAGAZINE/PERIODICAL
Today he lives with his beautiful wife and children in Southern California. Several of Graham’s short fiction works have been published by Pocket Books and Dawn Treader Press.
I finally tracked down these Inktense blocks by Derwent, having been told about them by a textile artist at Nature in Art last autumn. She achieved beautiful results with them on fabric and recommended them to me. I had to order them online and only received them the day before yesterday so haven't really had a chance to try them out. I do hope we get on with one another!
So I've decided that it’s time to be selfish and look after myself a bit better. My life is way too sedentary and it needs to change. It means carving out an extra hour and a half a day. But I can fritter that very easily on the internet – online word puzzles – so that habit is going to be broken and the time switched over to exercise.
For nearly half the book, Lustbader’s pace is much improved–we only stray from Jack, Alli, and Annika when necessary to the plot. Last Snow is much more coherent than First Daughter. But Lustbader loves his backstories and convoluted relations too much to let the main plot continue unhindered. The worst backstory offender is one that characters contemplate during car chases (slow ones, to be sure, but still car chases), with the runner-up being a backstory that evolves into a subplot that continues long after it’s useful to the main plot. Pace is still punched in the stomach every once in a while. I cannot tell you how many times I, after a legitimately interesting chase scene, sighed in disappointment to find several pages of Jack attempting to deal with the death of his daughter (now with supernatural appearances that are never explained). However, it is much improved–there was even a thrilling chapter where an antagonist got closer and closer while the good guys thought they were safe. I know that sounds like the least to demand of a thriller, but it is a wild improvement over First Daughter.
Anyway, here is a look into a few things I’ve worn, collected, and viewed as far as the Latin inspiration goes.
Jacobson JL, Jacobson SW. Effects of in utero exposure to PCBs and related contaminants on cognitive functioning in young children. J Pediatrics 1990; 116: 38-45.
In order to help fill the group break, I've paired up a bunch of the "lesser" teams into themed slots. Hopefully that will work out to make each price "fair" for all participants! All but the Pinnacle box offer the chance at some nice autographs and/or relics, not to mention serially numbered cards and plenty of unique inserts!
Here’s what I’ve found about Rule #2: Minute by minute, being where you are is a steadying thing. Strangely, being where I am makes me feel anchored and free at the same time. When I turn my focus to being present, suddenly I find I have a hidden well of quiet, one that runs deep, and is surprisingly full of space. Being in that moment frees me from the constrictions of wanting to be someplace else, sometime else. For those few moments, I can just be. And, even when I am feeling sad or miserable, being where I am surprises me by making me feel gratitude.
There is no excuse to claim you don’t know about the man we elect president. Your lack of curiosity, failure to pick up a newspaper or go to the library, is not Barack Obama’s fault. You need to read more.
Buoyed by the flattering opportunity to have been judged alongside the best of their homeland’s artistic peers, such as Flight Of The Conchords and Liam Finn, not to mention the release of their debut album in both New Zealand and Australia, this UK tour will see the band attacking the stage with unparalleled zeal.
In a large bowl, combine: 4 cups (16 oz.) shredded sharp cheddar, 24-oz. container low-fat cottage cheese, 2 turkey sausages cut on the diagonal
It's only money...isn't a quiet life worth it?
Cascade's Sang Noir is great as well and so dry you can blow the dust off the top, but the complex and wonderful sour notes shine though - another Gansberg masterpiece.
1/2 cup pecans
As we face hardship and trials in life, we no longer must rely on others to seek God’s Face for us but now can come boldly to the Throne of God with Jesus Christ as High Priest. He understands what we are facing and the weakness of our flesh. Grace covers our sin and now God’s Divine Favor and Blessing are released as mercy pours over our life. Two different things created one wonderful paradigm of life. Until we understand that Jesus Christ paid the sin debt of mankind in full and satisfied the penalty completely, we will continue to beg for mercy as a way out of our problems rather than receiving God’s Favor and Blessing while we face them. Mercy allows us to go through all the testing and challenging of life by the Grace of God without experiencing the same devastating consequences of those who choose to live without Him. Cancer came into our family just like it is ravaging our family again as well as our friends. Cancer is a horrible and devastating disease rendering people powerless in the fight. But God can even use cancer to release His Divine Favor and Blessing in your life. His Vision is Eternal and never temporal. As I said in the fight and now on the side of victory, God would heal our son. He would do it medically, miraculously or mercifully any of the three would be fine because His Faithful Love for my child was sufficient. God would do His Very Best for our child and will do the same for you if you will have His Mercy as He intended for you!
Another fish dish “Textures of Coastal Fish” comprised of a few more elements but was still incredibly simple conceptually. The plate showcases the Scorpion Fish with different parts of the fish prepared in a variety of ways – even the fins were fried and added for crunch.
Good Lord, this movie is cheesy to the max. To be quite honest, I was expecting a very serious movie with tear jerker moments since the movie was directed by Sergio Olhovich (director of Muneca Reina, a bizarre story about obsession and lost love). Now how is it cheesy you ask? Well, a lot of things happen in this movie. A lot of cheesy things. Like a fat chick chasing "Chivo" Cortez all over Mexico, then some of the other Bukis fly kites while indios play music in the background, then they also remember silly old times together (via flashbacks), then the Bukis make a female fan's night wonderful by having her on stage, give her flowers, and perform a song especially for her! Awwwww.....
in a sense I can call it “Holy frustration”
- Author Unknown
Senator Monti has democratic consent to govern and enjoys constitutional propriety, but the rule of law is weak and under determined assault by criminals. Moreover the consent of the political parties represented in Parliament is fragile. Neither left nor right have competent or even charismatic leadership, nor sufficiently united objectives among coalitions of parties, to wish to precipitate early elections. Spain was fortunate that elections were due when they were, and the electorate was clear in its democratic delivery of a mandate.
Stamps: The Stamps of Life (quote2love)
In the sequel to the acclaimed The Girl of Fire and Thorns, a seventeen-year-old princess turned war queen faces sorcery, adventure, untold power, and romance as she fulfills her epic destiny.
Each resource book specially covers the ‘solving problems’ objectives from the numeracy framework and contains clear photocopiable resources which can be viewed by the whole class or used by individuals. The length of the problems are varied with short, medium and more extended problems for children to solve.
Base Layer: 5 1/2" x 8 1/2",scored and folded at 4 1/4"
One thing is I have no idea how to get rid of the flour on the surface and the sides of the mooncakes - it should have looked much prettier without it - I guess I have dusted the mould with too much flour and it looked more obvious on dark color snowskin
The seller mentions the part is from 2004, 2003-2004 was the era when teams were switching from vaned fabricated uprights towards the more slender Ti designs with airflow passing around them. Additionally at the time carbon fibre was increasing being adopted as a gearbox material, with the heat and point loads that a gearbox has to accept being similar to that of an upright.
=Free wipes
How is my little person so aware and attentive and perceptive? He wants all the same things I want. He can say it in such a simple way. My brain gets all tangled up in the I miss my daughter but I want a baby... is that wrong to want one so soon even if it isn't the one I lost? I have gotten a couple weird looks when I tell people how I wish I was pregnant. I spent almost my entire 34th year growing this little girl and I was so ready to have her as part of our life that now it feels like we are supposed to have a baby. I really wish we had Camille and all those hormones and thoughts don't just magically disappear because she died. Right now all I can do is try and give all my love and attention to my son...just like I have been doing for the past 2.5 years and hope it is enough to carry me. It is not enough but it will have to be...I have no choice.
Disclaimer: Cheryl and Co. sent me a replacement order for my damaged cookies but I was not required to post anything about it. No compensation was received. The opinions expressed are my own.
I hope you have as much fun with this Q&A as I did!
For the tastiest results, bake the sausage the day before you plan to serve it, for the flavour improves in a startling fashion with an overnight maturation. Working backwards, this means ideally getting started 2 days in advance, as the raw meat needs to sit in its marinade overnight too.
It is a contest where there will be one winner (1 point) and one loser (-1 point) with no ties allowed — when the points are added the result is nil, a zero sum game.
If I trust life, if my only faith is that existence is somehow worth it whatever the cost, then I must trust that death is somehow right too. It is not the outrage that I have so often thought. It’s not a punishment for sin, whatever Adam and Eve thought.
Oh, and I register them for Kinder on the 12th!!!! I can't believe it!
Update on my Daredevil 2012 Hitlist: Cliff Diving. Done.
For the fish: Heat up olive oil in a small skillet, and cook the pompano 10-15 minutes per side. Stir in the garlic during the last 5-10 minutes of cooking.
I added some brushed nickel knobs I had left over from a craft project from years ago. New faucet in a brushed nickel with a gooseneck is being ordered soon!! The toilet paper roll holder is from Home Goods, $10. It is currently receiving mixed reviews. It is the one-sided mount style. Everyone likes that it is easy to take on and off...especially my 2 year old.
Initially adopted as a wartime-only policy, New York decided to bring Daylight Saving Time back after World War I and adopted a metropolitan Daylight Saving Time law for the city only in 1920. Cities ran on it, suburbs did not. Being such a powerful influence on the economy, almost every city from Chicago adopted it. By 1921, only Massachusetts had a statewide policy. All of this left a patchwork of times across the country for the next 10 years. This patchwork wreaked havoc with transportations schedules making it difficult to keep up. It has taken until 2006 to get to the levels of DST usage that this country currently has.
5. The belief that “Primrose” might just be the perfect name for your first-born girl.
Italian ended up filling our palette.
35. Caffeine raises fatty acid levels in the blood.
so I am having a lovely romp through its pages!
Fast forward again a few decades and we’re now in Sydney, 2009.
of the office on which I am about to enter, so help me God."
Keep choosing love each day. Every day that you invest in loving leadership, your organization will grow stronger. Ask God to give you fresh strength each day to model a lifestyle of leading with love to the people around you. Keep in mind that you can exert a strong positive influence on everyone in your organization – no matter what position you hold there – if you treat everyone with love. Ask God to help you see people as He sees them so you can recognize how much they matter. Set goals that are greater than just what you want to accomplish in your organization: set goals that define what type of person you want to become. Remember that leading with love is always worthwhile!
Then they cut to a live shot from the space station to earth below, a shot directly above the south Pacific ocean, with its cotton candy clouds just barely kissed by the first rays of dawns early light.
But I do find Cameron's pronouncements particularly odious and craven. Will we now see him with the zeal of a recent convert? Or just the payer of lip service with his fingers crossed that such criminality will not rear its head in so organised a fashion as last week.
You need to have critical thinking skills in order to connect the dots. But for now here’s what you can do:
So I need a draft. They help me. And I’m resurrecting THE ACCIDENTAL GODMOTHER. When I stopped querying, I knew that what that manuscript needed was a third to first person POV change. I needed to restructure the story and motivate my character so she was doing something and not being tossed around on the tides of Circumstance. Yes, the ending worked well, and even my toughest critic found he had a hard time critiquing because he was enjoying it so much, but the beginning… well, let’s just say it needed help. So I’m starting over from scratch with a POV change, a story restructure, and a lot of enthusiasm. I even have a shiny new title, but it turns out I’m really secretive about my titles… how silly is that?
“Go through,” the receptionist says.
See that picture up there??? That is a standard lunch bag that I've turned into a gift bag by printing on it. Isn't that grand? Many of us make treats or give small gifts that would easily fit in a small gift bag, right? Lunch bags come in basic Kraft brown or white and can be found at the grocery store or Walmart for pennies a piece. For a bit more money, paper bag-style bags can be found at the craft store in a range of other colors. Many of the craft store bags have a shiny finish on them so I'm not sure how they would work with this project. If you try it, let me know!
6 - A conscience is what hurts when all your other parts feel so good.
I want to get excited because the leader of the country that I live in is on television to give the nation a speech about new things that he has done – currently in the process of doing and will be doing in the future.
Sometimes these comments are indicated through the actions of people, as for instance a person who keeps insisting on something getting done so that his or her actions becomes a serious irritation. How that can then be used is to say generally “it’s an irritation” and an irritation can be something irritating a body tissue, as for instance in the throat or oesophagus. In the first example the suggestions are not made by the new neighbours nor their contractor because these people are too casually related to the victim. A close relative or friend of the victim has to be in the game in order to make mental suggestions. So suggestions for instance of “they’re cutting across the front of it” or “they cutting across near the entrance” are made together with “it’s an irritation” by someone very close to the victim, in this example Elle’s husband Joe, who after all is the chief offender. It could however equally be a jealous sibling or long term friend, as for instance a childhood friend that has become close like a sibling over the years into adulthood. What people need to remember is that these people do not normally act out. They look to befriend and appear credible and helpful in order to have not only proximity to the people they victimize but also their confidence and a free flow of their personal information.
While July will hopefully be the start of my triathlon training, there’s also another reason I’m excited for the month of July. I’ll be moving to Fayetteville, Arkansas to start work on a Master’s degree in Athletic Training. Fayetteville and the surround area is a beautiful area for outdoor recreation, which I love! The student fitness center even rents camping gear, canoes, and kayaks for students and I definitely plan on taking advantage of this!!!!!
Royalties are set at 40% of the retail price less the wholesaler’s discount (normally 40% to 55%), though, they do not mention if the print costs are also subtracted. Unusually, Derwent Press offer a full refund if authors are not happy with the quality of the book. They refer to their service as partnership publishing and it is priced at £595. This fee includes ISBN allocation, database and distribution listing, colour custom designed cover, and internal layout based on a submitted word file. Editing is available, but at an additional fee on request. Authors should also enquire about the cost of books they might want to order from the publisher as this fee does not include a print run or author copies.
1 triangulation
Magnifying One’s Calling: A conscious decision, approved of the Lord, to put your church responsibilities ahead of your family.
86, rue Montorgeuil
Who doesn't love snowflakes when thinking about Christmas? This card is for my wonderful in-laws. The family gave them money for Christmas (mainly because we couldn't think of anything else to give them). They can spend it on a trip or for unexpected expenses. There is a spot on the inside to stash the money. Also, this card was made for the latest die cut challenge over at Stuck On U Sketches. We were to use snowflakes. Here is how I made the card:
What is your take on the recent SOPA/ACTA controversy?
The sensitivity of Navtex receivers is generally quoted as "2uV emf". That sounds pretty good.at -107dBm. Should be okay? With an antenna factor of 10dB (small, inefficient antenna) you'd only need a field strength of +10dBuV/m. The ITU-R curves for a sea path would indicate that this field strength would be achieved at a distance of well over 1000km (from a 1kW Navtex transmitter). No problem for Cullercoats up in the waters around Shetland then? I have been calculating E-field strengths of up to 32dBuV/m for Culleroats, so this should be plenty signal for a receiver with a sensitivity of 2uV, even fed from a small antenna.
Let’s assume that this technology will eventually land you a contact lens with an inbuilt screen that you can actually scan and read normally.
Subjective subjects telling you how great it all is.
Abide, love and see
There are 53 confirmed picket protests scheduled for the city, with protesters crowding the New York Times building, Sotheby’s and the U.S. Post Office, among others.
I had previously purchased a brace to hold my knee in place for the run, but at mile 2.5 my knee gave out and the pain was immense; however, I carried on. I knew I was so close to the end and I actually ended up being one of the first finishers across the line! I paid for my choice to run for the rest of the day and even today it hurts to walk.
As little-‘D’ democrats, we audience-folk sympathize more with the enraged workers than the lust-crazed socialites, but Metropolis doesn’t really take a side. Grot, the burly foreman who might have made a good mediator himself, calls the rioters fools for destroying the machine he maintains—the ‘Heart Machine’—because doing so will swamp their own workers’ city, and their children with it. No one hears him. Soon the machine is destroyed; the waters begin to rise around the workers’ drab apartment blocks, and lights of the spectacular world above wink out. Atop the very tallest tower, in the dark, it finally dawns on Joh Fredersen that his plan has gone awry, and his son’s life is threatened. “Tomorrow thousands will ask in fury and desperation: Joh Fredersen, where is my son—!” declares the Thin Man. And below, the workers, now dancing hand-locked circles around the ruins of Moloch, finally hear Grot’s message. They wail in grief, then congeal into a vengeful mob. Suddenly everyone, everywhere, gets it.
Black cohosh is one of many plants that contain nutrients with structures similar to human estrogen. These are called “phytoestrogens” because they originate with plants instead of animals. Phytoestrogens have been used to relieve hot flashes, night sweats and many other symptoms related to hormone imbalance. They can also be used when cancer therapy creates these symptoms.
I started up the chute following two people I could see ahead. I followed in their steps so I did not have to kick my own steps. About a third of the way up, the rocks were exposed and I had to climb over them to get back on the snow. At about the halfway point I caught up with the two people at another rocky section. It was a bit harder here to get from the snow to the rocks, I had to jump down a few feet. Here the other two people decided that they were not equipped for the the snow and headed back down. After crossing the rocks, I was once more on the snow. Here it was more icy and I stopped and put the crampons on. This helped a lot.
They all looked at me saying yes, yes, please come. But first, answer one question. The words weren’t even out of their mouth…
The Eb, however, moves once again to D minor with a repeat of the melody heard at the beginning of the verse. When we first heard that melody, of course, it sounded like an antecedent line within the lyrical structure (naturally, given that it was the first line of the verse). Here, however, it sounds like a consequent line, following after and completing the phrase begun in the two lines just before it. There's even a drum fill, as though we are reaching the end of the section.
When Titanic hit the iceberg and sank on the night of April 14, 1912, there were conflicting reports of what the casualties were. People were understandably desperate to find out whether their loved ones were all right, but nobody knew what the story was regarding survivors. The result was that 80,000 people were at the harbor in New York awaiting the arrival of Carpathia, the only ship that carried Titanic‘s survivors. If your loved ones survived the catastrophe, they were aboard Carpathia. If not, well, there wasn’t much else to be said.
As promised list of contents of Monster Fun No 1 dated 14/6/75.
I play it later to my mother who didn't really care for the song when she first heard it long ago, but I point out the line, echoing Lizzie. Later my mother admits she's changed her mind about it. That's what Lizzie does...she's infectious. She did the same with LCD Soundsystem and their song I Can Change. I hear it and I think of Lizzie and how I love her.
resolved statement stating that the resolution – if passed – be sent to a variety of different organizations. A sort of heads up on what we’re doing. I was thinking how great it would be if I wrote an absolutely serious, cogent resolution that then requested that it be sent to, multi-Olympic Gold medalist Bonnie Blair, Prince, and whoever turns out to be the father of Anna Nicole Smith’s daughter.*
singalong chorus perhaps
I have two new workouts I’ve completed in the last week. I rarely do the same workout twice in the same month or so, I get bored way too easily.
So now I place it in your hands, the times and truly the sands, the waves and that
BORN OF A BROKEN MAN
That's about four times the energy in the rifle round vs. the pistol round; even though the rifle bullet is only about 1/2 the diameter, and about 1/4 of the mass.
“That is exactly what happens when this music is played. This music acts as a concrete catalyst.”
Greenpeace has conducted the study in each of the last five years, and no retailer had ever achieved a “green” rating. Until now.
10p- Hawaii 5-0
I have a love/hate relationship with my wig. Okay, maybe that statement is a bit strong. Let’s just say it reminds me of having a haircut that you’re not completely sure of…you know, it’s not the worst style you’ve ever had but you’re not all that crazy about it either.
09. Jane - 1948
And every week we need a theme,
There are just two incidents, among many, with which I will conclude the Ted saga.
If you are thinking on challenges for scholars the answer is not so simple. The problem is multifaceted (just like a number of Slavic gods). First, there is an obvious bias in academic community. Scholars of social sciences in most cases regard Slavic religion as anachronism, a surpassed relic, a primitive and barbaric set of customs and superstitions rather than religion and culture in full sense of the term. The trouble is of course lack of Slavic pagans in academic community that would represent fairly and without bias the legacy of our ancestors. The scholars that are adherents of Christianity, in most cases follow the views of religious authorities with outright hostility towards Slavic religion (infamous statement of patriarch of Russian Orthodox Church given in September 2010 to the Russian state TV channel “Россия” on Slavs before Christianization is illustrative example), while atheistic scholars in most cases deny even the very existence of Slavic mythology (statement of certain professor from Department of Ethnology and Anthropology of Belgrade University in which he, not only claims that Slavic mythology doesn’t exist, but also denounces the scholars that research it as “freaks” and “tellers of stories for children”) or regard it as backward, something that has no place in modern society. Those scholars that present their findings (based on archaeological, ethnological and other evidence) regarding Slavic religion face hostility among their peers (e.g. the recent case of Professor Đorđe Janković, renowned archaeologist, who has been prevented from further teaching on the University, after publishing his findings that are clear and indisputable proof that Slavic people on Balkan peninsula continued to burn their dead long after the official history claims they were converted to Christianity).
Later in the evening, Mama took me up to the lake for a swim. She thought it would be a nice way to cool off. I had a great time splashing around in the water and chasing my ball. After I dried off a little, we sat on the bench, shared a sandwich and watched sunset together. Mom use to do that all the time with Sweet Pea. She is finally able to do it with me, and not cry. ♥♥♥
In April 2010 I had considerably more hair, with considerably more redness…..
(Temporary Services' project may also be related to trends having to do with collectivity and socially-engaged art practices generally, which have their notable practitioners and theorists, as well as to conceptual art. I also find it interesting that the artists chose to distribute their publication in the form of hardcopy newspapers, at a time when print is on the ropes, as well as via the project's website. The collective has been described as "working out of a Situationist tradition"; their work or publications have been been featured at Mass MoCA, The Elizabeth Foundation for the Arts, the Smart Museum of Art, and elsewhere.)
We're leaving for a week long visit to cambridge in two weeks. I can't wait to see friends and eat at my favorite places. I had been hoping to go shopping for new clothes and sandals, but to be honest, I'm not in the mood.
He was gone for awhile, but I see him back, blogging about animals he has stolen. Honest to gods, I was going to put him up before his hiatus, because his interpretations are a big pile of in-retrospect-and-when-grouped-all-together skull sludge, but then when he was gone I assumed it was something unpleasant, so I didn't want to kick him while he was down.
freshly whipped cream
Shimmer Scarf, J. Crew, $18
John said, “We haven’t pushed the button yet.”
I'm not worrying about the rest of the day...it's Mother's Day!
DEAR ROBYN: Wow! What an experience! While these stories are upsetting to the writer, I welcome hearing the horror stories between consumers and lenders. Hopefully, some lenders will realize that consumers are human, and will ultimately change their tactics.
All occupiers are equal — but some occupiers are more equal than others. In wind-whipped Zuccotti Park, new divisions and hierarchies are threatening to upend Occupy Wall Street and its leaderless collective.
Dad:
Viewers say that the reason ratings are slipping is because “the Lee Jae Ha character that Lee Seung Gi plays isn’t very attractive.” The character is so unpopular that viewers are saying the most impressive scene was when Lee Seung Gi was eating donuts. Why is Lee Seung Gi’s Lee Jae Ha so unlikeable?
Is it wealth? If so is it a relative number? Could I be a reasonable candidate for an unemployed lady's TAL somewhere?
It has been a quiet weekend. Yesterday was our 8th anniversary and we just stayed home and watched old movies. I had not seen Mr. Roberts
Use this and then imagine yourself trying to explain what in the bejeezus you have stuffed up in your drawers the next time you about to commence with some sexy time!!
You can keep your bowlers black,
"A turnover of companions is helpful. Rory and Amy are veterans. They're actually pretty good when they get into danger. But if it goes on forever it becomes The A-Team." - Steven Moffat
BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF GLSEN’S RECOMMENDED BOOKS
Two really great beers from Japan. We have a range of six in at the shop at the moment, and I really suggest trying them. My only experience of Japanese beer so far has been Asahi in the past, and while Ashai Black was OK, it wasn't anything to write home about. Apart from that, it's always been the Japanese Whisky that's floated my boat, some/most of them are good enough to rival any Scotch Whisky, they clearly know what they're doing. It's a similar story with Kiuchi Brewery - They clearly know what they're doing.
Parents want to take tons of pictures so they can remember all those special moments.
the remainder of the boys school holidays
We have been in and out of doctor's offices too much lately. Our oldest daughter fought a could while we were in China and it turned into a real bad sinus infection after we returned home. Her visit to the doctor has been tame compared to Rae.
Alternatively, you can focus on sites that target the specific kind of job you want. For example, Dice.com is a good option for tech-related jobs and Authentic Jobs is a great option for designers and developers. Conduct a web search for the type of job you’re looking for and the term “job search site” and you may find a tool that’s more focused on your specific needs.
Unfortunately I came across this fantastic haul of clothes after a sad event at work.... My boss's little puppy died unexpectedly. She was devastated of course. I tried my best to console her but luckily there were those better experienced on hand to help.
10. Carriers: 4 vs. 3
Jack Ross / From the Twilight Kingdom / 106
Kim. - 15
Guess what? I found some goodn's! Then I proceeded to nearly break my back trying to get them out of the car when I got home. I don't wait on help very well! Honestly, I continue to be amazed that God protects me from my own stupidity like he does. If his love was based on intelligence or goodness, I'd be a lost cause:)
I think it was probably all very hard, but it was also very good. I've seen most of the US on various business trips and met a lot of really fascinating people.
“Go to now, ye that say, Today or tomorrow we will go into such a city and continue there a year, and buy and sell, and get gain. Whereas ye know not what shall be on the morrow. For what is your life? It is even a vapour that appeareth for a little time, and then vanisheth away. For that ye ought to say, If the Lord will, we shall live, and do this or that.”
My oldest daughter, Jessica, (Who is graduating college in two weeks… go Jessica… there are pictures of her in some earlier posts if you wonder how stunning she is)… told me that I should never… sorry, told me that I should try not to do more than one post a day… (No matter how many frightfully clever things I have to say)… She thinks that will alienate my readers. I am going to ignore that advice today… again…
for your encouragement
It is for some online jollity he is planning and he did mention it to me before I went to North Korea (did I mention I went to North Korea?). In fact, I think he suggested it to me almost two years ago. I have a notoriously bad memory and can’t remember why he was asking me questions.
The products I used: Cricut cartridge- 3 Birds on Parade
Only to realise, the reason we had only one view, only one window,
And a wonderful joint repository of information and help. Long live the SAS - Who Shares Wins.
I've not heard a peep from them in nearly 30 years. I don't think I was one of their favourite students, being a bit troublesome and everything, but I was made welcome when a friend and I went back to visit in '87. I'd put on a bit of weight by then, and on arrival we ran into two old teachers who were shocked at my appearance. Gone was the skinny kid, and here was this blimp. We caught up, said our goodbyes and as they turned the corner they both burst into laughter. I've not felt so humiliated since someone on a train asked me if I was Lady Sarah Armstrong Jones.
“Can you tell us what it felt like when the plant took root in your solar system?”
Hope you like these as much as I do. :^)
You get the idea: there are many examples you can find of people who have taken their ideas and gone out on their own. This path is uncertain, it’s scary, it’s exciting, and it’s incredibly rewarding. Just ask them.
I've finally managed to finish the piece I was working on. This was a special watercolor paper that Nancy Goldman sent me to try. I also liked painting on this surface. I did notice a couple of things, however... Often my edges tended to dry hard and I had to go back in with a damp q-tip to blend them out a bit. This paper was great if you want to lift paint also.
8pm, thursday 10 May 2012
God reveals himself in glory.
Anyhoo....I thought I would share a few of my favorite cleaning products with y'a'll.
In 1927, Silent films were at the height of their power and George Valentin (Jean Dujardin) is at the height of his. Valentin stars in films that are sort of a cross between the action hero roles played by Douglas Fairbanks and the exotic foreigner of Rudolph Valentino. One of Valentin’s many female admirers is the young and spunky Peppy Miller (Berenice Bejo), who sneaks in a kiss at the premiere of one of his latest film. This pays out for her later when George helps land her a role as a an extra in one of his films and gives her some useful career advice.
The Americana Festival is huge, with two live music arenas, one for Rock and Roll and the other for country music. There were big trucks, Winnebagos and classic cars everywhere. There was an exhibition shed full of Harley Davidson bikes.
Michael H: i don’t have a question, but I would like to request more and sexier photo shoots.
Description: Water covers approximately 70 percent of our world's surface and many of us will never see the glorious colours of a coral underwater garden. Let your imagination have fun colouring this little underwater scene. This digital could be used for friends, family or someone that has a connection with the ocean.
Miscellaneous material for your Monday reading.
This month is dedicated to abundance.
Although learning to stir my coffee without a clatter hasn’t helped me rise very far on the social scale, a certain amount of conformity is good. Jesus conformed to ceremonial washing before a meal. He also attended the synagogue even though He acknowledged that some of the Jewish religious leaders were like “whited sepulchers” (Matt 23:27), appealingly clean on the outside but full of decay and rot.
Finally Yudhiṣṭhira must place the question directly, with great fear and unwillingness to accept the possibility of an awful negative reply.
Utterly annoying. And charming.
You know, the one that you use in your head for about a week after being married, and then start saying Out Loud to your new Husband.
But I am the first one to admit that sometimes their prices are more than I can stomach. Case in point - I was at the store last week and spotted this adorable Kites & Constellations Cardigan. After my recent obsession with vintage star charts, I couldn't believe my eyes! A star chart cardigan! It's totally adorable. What's not adorable though is the $118 price tag.
I will not deny that effective, and easily accessible, contraception has benefits for individuals, however, millions of indigenous European children, whom nature intended to be conceived, have not been conceived as a direct result of the contraceptive pill, and the benefits, if any, of that loss to us collectively as European people are less easy to quantify.
Changed Tube to GE JAN 6091a (NOS) military
Nonetheless, as the “To Banker from Bankies” 2009 report (which was supported and funded by Oxfam) states, in 2007 Freud was appointed as the key Government advisor on welfare reform by Labour’s John Hutton, having been commissioned to produce a report “Reducing Dependency, Increasing Opportunity” on the “Welfare to Work” programme. This was despite the fact that, in his own words, Freud “didn’t know anything about welfare at all” (Daily Telegraph, 4th February 2008). Despite the great complexity of the welfare system, Freud researched and wrote his welfare “shake-up” plan in just three weeks. It recommended that the existing role of private firms (such as the French company Atos) in the Government’s “Welfare to Work” programme be dramatically increased; he acknowledged that there was no evidence to suggest that private contractors were any better than the Department for Work and Pensions, but he still concluded that it would be “economically rational” to pay them tens of thousands of pounds for every person they removed from benefits.
We hope these cards have offered some inspiration to get your creative juices flowing!!
It added: “He wondered if the government could now, as an administrative act, make the changes to the prison regime which it had agreed in principle to make but pending the end of the hunger strike had not yet implemented.” However, the secretary of state countered that a precipitative move by the government to meet some of the prisoners’ demands could “lead to another matter on which to take issue with the government”.
I like to do things so that people will think I’m responsible or righteous, loving or loving life, in shape or in control, mysterious or more (fill in the blank) than I really am.
Marchesi Di Barolo Dolcetto '09
Pencils.
For an answer there came the strangest words:
I hope you guys have a great weekend
The good news was that with all that work I did over the week, I had the weekend to myself. So yesterday I spent most of the day cleaning the house top to bottom. Everything from mopping every floor of the house to changing the sheets on the bed, dusting the entire house, and cleaning both bathrooms. Plus laundry. I was tired when I was through, but that great kind of tired that comes from a job well done. Plus, I had a sparkling clean house to wake up to this morning.
So I blithely started writing the damn things, rapidly became addicted to both seeing and writing in this new compressed way, and started sensing that there might be more to this charming little poetic form than I had suspected. And then, and only then, did I start reading other people’s haiku, and reading about the form, trying to figure out what it was really about.
The economic week kicks off on tuesday with Case-Shiller, Consumer confidence, New home sales, and the FHFA housing index. On wednesday, Durable goods orders and the FED concludes its FOMC meeting. On thursday, weekly Jobless claims and Pending home sales. Then on friday Q1 GDP, estimates at +2.6%, and Consumer sentiment. Best to your week!
Givenchy’s clothes suited Audrey’s tall, slender silhouette perfectly and the pieces she chose that day quickly become iconographic. And she very quickly became his muse, and they worked together for the rest of her life.
Michael Gogliormella, 43, New Providence, N.J.
I was joining a new team with a new boss and sitting with two newish girls. I wasn't mad about it but I had no choice. Soon enough however we were laughing all the day long and we became quite pally, especially me and the girl opposite.
So what's changed in three years? I mean, 35 new businesses notwithstanding, the various speculation I've heard about this site in the intervening 37 months (whoa - that's practically one new business a month! Just realized that, folks.) has almost always centered on the need to scale down the original plan, perhaps to a single-story Duane Reade or Walgreens. There was also talk of Medgar Evers College buying the site, as well as a bank branch. Still, three years later, it seems the original plan (8 stories, 63 units, gym - was this the one Tish was talking about? - and ground floor retail) is back on the table. So, readers, while it's unlikely we'll have much say, what would your perfect bid for this site look like?
Oh my poor blog! As you can imagine, life with twins got interesting. My little sweethearts keep me busy these days. I have a great topic today for you, enjoy.
First, cut the potatoes. almost in a cubed shape. Follow directions on seasonings package to coat potatoes and put in microwave.
Earlier in note 15, the company says that the loans are secured on a variety of securities including, “personal guarantees and indemnities by directors”
Then I cried some more.
Every now and again a book drops through my mailbox with such a pedigree it becomes quite hard to write about it. One such is A Monster Calls. There has been a lot of publicity lately for The Pale King by David Foster Wallace, published after his death and leading to much talk about whether it is right to finish an author's final work.
- And their ultimate marketing philosophy? All customers are stupid in IT.
Dead on two the lock gates opened and the red light was exchanged for a green one, so we were on our way again.
09/15/2010 SELL 0.01 eurjpy 109.63 10/15/2010 113.77 -51.76
and treasuring all the wonderful parts in my heart.
This isn’t to say that IBM wouldn’t be a benevolent tyrant, but we’re talking about a computer company — not an urban planner. IBM’s Watson might excel at big data analysis for tasks such aswinning Jeopardy or medical diagnosis, but these are well known, absolute domains — managing a city is something else entirely. A city has billions of variables, and millions of those are highly volatile humans prone to all sorts of crazy stuff. Does it really make sense to have computers making decisions that will affect these people’s lives, instead of trained, empathetic human workers?
kinda drama,huh?
Just take a dump in cyberspace why don't you? No really here, I'll hold the loo roll.
She/he then directed me to lean over the exam table on my elbows. Talk about getting caught with my pants down! “Uh, Doc,” I said in a Peter Brady voice-changing tone, “Didn’t we do the prostate check last time with the blood-work?”
Roy Williams, by mentioning Chaos theory, has stepped into a spiraling vortex of facts, knowledge and maths. That’s all for today, I will leave you with a quote from Benoit Mandelbrot, “Science would be ruined if (like sports) it were to put competition above everything else, and if it were to clarify the rules of competition by withdrawing entirely into narrowly defined specialties. The rare scholars who are nomads-by-choice are essential to the intellectual welfare of the settled disciplines.” Benoit Mandelbrot, a French/American Mathematician of some note.
Well done Sean!
Today, I find myself living in the southwest of France in a place I could have never dreamed of. It abounds with life — birds, animals, insects and woodlands. There are more trees than people, and many of the inhabitants of these savage lands live just outside the arena of the physical world that we are so familiar with. In spite of the typical challenges that come with life itself, wherever any of us might live, I would have to say this place is simply “exotic.”
I’ve been treated to some wonderful Christmas music. My childhood steeped in the Irish Catholic methodology taught me deep appreciation for a multitude of venues ranging from the swells of a mammoth pipe organ to the pure beauty of a capella voices in a tiny Appalachian church. Christmas music varies from country to country, ethnicity to ethnicity and region to region, but has the common thread of joy and love. I’ve been truly fortunate to have spent many wonderful Christmases soaking up a lot of different cultures.
Some of the “upper castes,” it seems, are bent on leaving behind Britishers when it comes to the issues of oppression. Dalits are targeted most because the perpetrators are aware that they are not empowered. On July 11, 1997, sub-inspector M.Y. Kadam left General Dyer of Jallianwalabagh massacre behind, when he fired shots at his own countrymen and co-religionist Dalit protesters, above the waist, who had gathered in Ramabai colony in Mumbai in protest against desecration of Dr Ambedkar’s statue.
"... This book's aim is to find appropriate rules to regulate overlaps and thereby avoid regime conflicts and undue unstructured expansion of IPRs. The book studies the practical consequences of each overlap at the international, European and national levels (where the laws of France, the UK and Germany are reviewed). It then analyses the reasons for the prohibition or authorisation of overlaps. This analysis enables the determination of criteria and principles that can be used to (re)map the overlaps to achieve appropriateness and legitimacy".
Special thanks to Sharron Rush and all of you accessibilty angels around the globe who are planning to do assessments in John's name. Amazing...
One day they will fade (hopefully!) and of course next summer's goal will be to be in a size/shape that I love again -- but I've officially hit mom-dom and have resigned myself to always searching for a sleek, sexy, ONE-piece. Hopefully that's possible without having to show off too many of my Bradley induced battle-scars. I've never been a tanning/sun lover, but I hear that helps hide stretch marks so I might have to find a way to start (or at least look like I tan).
In addition, we ask that you spread the word. Ask your spouse, your friends, and your acquaintances to act now. Facebook, twitter, and email about this. Let’s start a school library movement! Your voice counts – please use it on behalf of professionally staffed school libraries.
Wore this outfit because I was anticipating it to be 65 degrees in Paris the other day, turns out weather.com lies and it only reached 60. Bummer. I'm so sick of rainy and grey weather, I'm ready to bust out some summer clothing, and not freeze my ass off whilst wearing it!
Part 1 of The Halsteadarian is premièring at the Steam Punk Film Festival in Portland Oregon Feb 13th 2011 with a London première also in the pipeline.
daughters all time favorite. I stick with my go to banana bread recipe which is out of this
but the LORD rises upon you
The live event uses chat features. Some organizations use firewalls to block out chat features. To check this before the event, go to http://www.schoolsmovingup.net/livewebinar after you have successfully run the wizard. If you have problems logging onto this site, please contact your IT group and ask them to open the port to this secure site. (Note: You don’t need to use the same login/password to access the live event area – any guest name will do, and NO password is required).
I'll let you know when my (awesome) new website is running and I hope to have a more active blog-life in the near future. At the moment (post-Honours year, post-2011) I'm taking some time to sort out all those little projects I've not had time to deal with (website, deleting old blogs, filing my receipts from 2007 onwards) and I'm pretty excited about some of the things that are about to happen.
Stages of Gospel Growth - Outreach, follow up, growth, ,training.
The pup that got away, Dante took a little time to adjust to life here but he's doing well now. He would shake whenever The Man tried to pet him. Once he got used to him though he was find. I think we're going to try to take them to the dog park tomorrow.
There will be two sessions, each lasting an hour and a half.
Hey guys, Azeebo here
I couldn’t figure it out, I couldn’t think of anything that was different yesterday than on any previous run.
I've been pricing these pasta makers and ravioli attachments online and I'm thinking I got a great deal.
Later in May, I found my Inner Toddler, my “I Want”. This part of me had been suppressed in shadow, and in shadow it became something to fear. When I let her out she was Beautiful, though I still felt frightened of that energy.
6 strips of cooked crispy bacon, crumbled
Most people consider yoga to be some exotic, mystical, even quasi-religious experience, and that turns them off. To avoid this turn-off, yoga in America has evolved into a form of physical exercise that focuses on building strength, increasing flexibility, and improving balance. There is still a minimal amount of attention to stress relief and meditation (the concluding shavasana), but chanting is almost always excluded. I have one new instructor at Lifetime Fitness who likes to throw in a few chants even though she acknowledges that some participants object because of its religious implications.
I'm ending with a video by Sir Paul. Then some pictures for Faith to look at. She's seems to have forgotten all our animals except for Dammit. Who could forget Dammit? How she could forget Bootsie is beyond us.
I look at the paths of my friends lives and can't help comparing.
These days, dog owners want quality food and products for their dogs. They also want choices, hence the reason for so many different dog food companies and pet supply stores.
Plus, it’s just fun to talk about movies you’re really excited to see. What else have we got to do for the next 21 days? (Again, not that I’m counting!)
Friday the 13th Part 2 opens with Alice pottering around her apartment telling her mom that she's fine. She's totally fine. She's even taking meds to combat the anxeity of being the only survivor out of all her friends. See? Fine. Totally fine.
I've told you that I've been volunteering with a dachshund rescue, right?! Right! Well, I've been given the opportunity to adopt a new puppy. Which, it goes without saying, I said "yes" to immediately.
angels still waiting
MAUNA LOA, HAWAII – The scientific world was rocked yesterday by revelations that the theory of anthropogenic global warming, commonly known as ‘climate change’, was founded on an inaccurate measurement made by a work-experience student early in the 1980s.
As all good things do, the night had to come to an end. He dropped me off in the room I shared with my sister Rachel and I crawled in to bed. In my clothes.
1 Mississippi Boweavil Blues
The international research team led by Saku Tsuneta, a professor at NAOJ, has been performing the monthly polar observations with Hinode from September 2008. We here report the discovery that the average magnetic flux of the north polar region is rapidly and steadily decreasing during the period of 2008 and 2012 (Figure B). The reversal (from minus to plus polarity) is taking place in sequence from lower latitude to higher latitude. The average magnetic flux of the polar region soon becomes zero. The estimated completion of the reversal of the north polar region will take place in 1 months or so, about one year earlier than the nominal expected reversal time.
On page sixty-nine, returning from his shift at the Tombs with every intention of quitting the following day, a little girl wearing a blood-drenched nightdress runs into his knees. And Tim, almost in spite of himself, makes a life-changing choice: he decides to take her into his own home.
The medicine I can say helped and I, and the person I looked after on location felt better from it.
Cool the pita bread on a baking rack. Store in an air-tight container. Enjoy with hummus, use for sandwiches or make delicious gyros.
That alone is something to be excited about, right? Write.
04. Sinner
You can reach HUD toll-free by calling (800) 569-4287.
I give no permission.
My brothers aren’t that clever though.
For what you are about to receive
Carrie Ann: Read a book or write. Yep. I’m that boring!
Colour Symbolism in Ancient Cultures:
I’m going to chat to Trish and Teresa very soon about how they see their collection fitting in with the wardrobe of a “lady of a certain age” (ie: me and the forty plus set). Watch this space. They are super stylish women so will have some good things to say. I have my eye on a beautiful large scarf in a rope print, the aforementioned leather skirt, a black cape/dress (really versatile, can be buttoned up and belted as a fab mid-calf dress, or worn long with shorts or jeans), and a pretty and light white cotton shirt. I’ve always wanted a leather skirt, and forty seems like a good time to invest.
Select design jobs that align with your morals. The ability to express your creative freedom can be cut off at the knees if you disagree with the morality of the design job. The architectural firm I work for was in bid phase for a new refugee detention centre, some of the team members refused to work on such a project, and it was such a hotly contested topic. If a family member is in cancer remission, and you are a packaging designer, chances are you will unconsciously sabotage your own work if its a cigarette packet you’ve been asked to design. If you find there are negative implications of doing your job well (and lets face it, you should be doing your best) the parameters will feel so stifling that even if youve done an amazing job, you’ve still failed. And it is that knowledge alone which crushes your freedom. You have the power to choose your client as much as they can choose you.
The use of words like theology, violation of religious liberty when it comes to health insurance, or because of birth control are examples of appealing to a specific faction. Abortion violates the Constitution? We are a Christian nation. I believe in strict interpretation of the Constitution and states rights? How? In what way? The Marriage Protection Act is another example of fear mongering, is marriage really going to disappear? Is Christianity in the US under attack? Illegal Immigration and jobs? Obama is making us socialist?
Brine poultry solely to aid in moisture retention and marinate adding a slight level of flavor in impoving the overall quality. Folks say once you brine a bird for barbecuing or grilling, you'll never do it another way. Well, there are many ways to barbecue which is cooking over indirect heat. Grilling is cooking over direct heat and most birds I know prefer low, slow indirect cooking times, that is, unless you liked yours blackened. I like to brine in the solution below as well as use a buttermilk brine sometimes too. Both I think are exceptional. And then there are times that I do not brine at all. In other words, it is a preference how you go about cooking your bird and the desired outcome you want.
What strikes me as super strange about this film first off is the notion that a bunch of birds and laddies on motorbikes can ride through workaday British shoppers and harass the locals and only one bobby e'er shows up to stop 'em. Special note to bakery delivery guys: don't try to walk across the lane with a stack of freshly baked bread while bikers are roaring their engines around, terrorizing the populace right outside your shop. And if you're up on a ladder in the middle of the lane, get down! Then again, reality is not high on the menu in PSYCHOMANIA. Instead it flatters the palate of the sugar-addicted adolescent, making up in vandalism and chipper death cult romance what it lacks in meat, fiber, and coherence.
P.S. Does anyone else feel lost on Pinterest without Christmas ideas to save and obsess over completing? I couldn't help but giggle when I saw notices that people had repinned Halloween and football pins in place of Christmas. It's like we're lost with no direction. Is it Valentine's Day yet? V-Day = new board = new world of procrastination.
Manifesting is a gift all of us possess. As we clear our beliefs, we begin to recognize our abilities as we see them exhibit in our lives. We begin to make the correlation between what we desired and what became the focus of our attention, and what eventually showed up in our life in one form or another.
And the best part is that there are currently 81 releases. About every 3 months a new release is available so there is more variety. Instructors can stick to one release from start to finish, or pick tracks from different releases.
As always, thanks for reading, everyone! Have a nice weekend and stay tuned for more!
Today, Rich shared a video that Cutrone uploaded to YouTube, see above.
1132 D-III/25/1992. “Sports, Death, and Taxes.” (With Anne-Marie Rhodes,) Women’s Law Society, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
- 2 smaller type apples
Jonathan Franzen’s latest novel – Freedom -- never explicitly deals with the question of freedom, and yet the idea of it permeates every aspect of the novel. Instead of the Berlin Wall, this novel has the Twin Towers falling down – one destruction so positive, the other so negative. It is a novel that feels more personal than political, but the political circumstances of the past decade are always there in the background – and to this reader, at least, it felt like there was a comprehensive intelligence and understanding at work. I was in awe of the detail and the scope, (no wonder Franzen keeps getting compared to the great 19th century novelists), but the narrative never gets diverted from the relationships which are its core.
“I hid it from you because I never wanted you to worry about me, Chunnie… It’s okay…” He peck Yoochun’s lips.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Season short ribs with salt and pepper. Heat oil in a large Dutch oven over medium-high heat. Working in 2 batches, brown short ribs on all sides, about 8 minutes per batch. Transfer short ribs to a plate. Pour off all but 3 tablespoons drippings from pot.
I saw Titanic 3D last weekend, and I can't get Kate Winslet out of my head. She does such a great job as Rose. I spent the first quarter of the film unable to get over how ridiculously young Leonardo DiCaprio was, and then I spent the rest of the film unable to get over Kate Winslet's acting.
Holidays are a good opportunity to have a little fun while learning, and Halloween is a great time of year to be working with numbers, as demonstrated by Mrs. Langham's Hill Elementary Kindergarten class. I love how much energy her students have while counting and singing about the bats and cats of Halloween! Thanks so much for sharing your holiday fun with us!
Alrighty so yes once again I am behind. Its over a month!? ACKK!! It seems to be the story of my life right? I’ll make this semi quick as I have to get ready for class tomorrow. Once again at the butt crack of dawn… And yeah that fox picture from the last post is still a WIP! ACK!
I APOLOGIZE TO ALL OF MY READERS! I AM TRULY SORRY TO BE ENDING THIS BLOG AND THE CHALLENGES BUT YOU DESERVE SOMEONE WHO WON'T DO A HALF-ASSED JOB AT IT! IF I CAN'T ENJOY DOING WHAT I'M DOING, I JUST DON'T SEE THE POINT IN CONTINUING.
Ribbon : Prints
And in this state of mortal lust,
Please email me so I can get your details to our fab sponsors.
Dessert: Vanilla ice-cream.”
and dang it. .if he is I am gonna be ready for him. so this year my goal is to get out of the 20's and into the teens before I turn 40. That way it will not be oh no 4-0.. it will be wut ohhhhh 4--oooohhhhh ;o)
Amit asked, I would like PHD in general management/finance! I am an MBA with eight years of experience in the industries of Media, Financial Services, Consulting & IT. Would you recommend any specific area which I could target?
Iván Meade – You are quite mysterious when it comes to finding out more about you, I had trouble finding information for my intro. Could you tell us a little more about yourself? We love to hear about our interviewees path to success!
can came & went. I have been blown away at what God has done thru this
There is this sergeant who calls up and every female that answers the phone she thinks is Katie, every male she thinks is James. I've been told it's not that I don't sound like me, it's that I don't sound like James. Great. Oh well, maybe if I make a mistake with her, Katie will get the blame, ha ha ha ha!
I'm not at all sure about Abalone.
I am sharing this not to get comforting comments back. But to be accountable. If I can't SEE with the little I have now, I won't be trusted to see with much.
A rip is a resource from another title you are using in your game. For example, if you are putting Mario graphics into your game, you are using Mario rips. Some rips are infamous for their overuse and so are best avoided, such as music from the Final Fantasy series or the "Rudra" tileset series.
When the PS3 launched most struggling publishers had to avoid supporting Sony. When Midway tried to support Sony they struggled to break even or profit they ended up dying. Atari likewise ended up having to sell IP and close almost all of its internal studios. Majesco too had to restructure. As this generation wraps up the fifth highest selling publisher in the world THQ is struggling to keep its head above water.
When does it become old?
The work presented is obscure, arcane, and surrealist beyond Surrealism, hermetic, a body of work that is self-reflective and so interior and personal as to make little sense to an outsider. Warner likes to image Johnson's method as a three sided (or even a multi-person) game in which person hits the ball to their neighbor so that the ball goes around and around, instead of back and forth. Each time, the ball (i.e. mail art, letters, rubber stamped collages, etc) would accumulate more items, more instructions, more people roped into Johnson's machinations.
Now keep in mind, I play tapes through a bass amp. I don’t have stereo, but swirling synths surrounded me so that I felt like Chris was in the room playing a ritual song that he has known since birth. A waterfall of distorted noise began to swell until I felt like I was floating. At the end of the A side, I was astounded by Chris’s production capabilities as each segment flowed with one another so fluidly that you forgot about time. I felt like that tape could go on forever, and then it ended just like the turn of a page.
The People shall exercise their sovereignty within the aspects and limits prescribed in the Constitution.
Death Of A Rude Boy
Until then his story is almost pro forma. Included are his family and his generally unhappy childhood, his early same-sex infatuations, the prevailing fear of exposure—yet being centred-out as gay, anyway; proving, I suppose, that the ‘closet’ has see-through walls at times—and the mindless abuse he suffered on account of it. Through it all, however, his will to achieve never faltered, and it is this that makes his story truly inspirational.
Needless to say, I am exhausted. I learned a very important lesson this week though...one that many new graduates don't learn until later in their orientation...I DON'T KNOW ANYTHING!!! My husband and my friends would certainly disagree with me on that, but it's true.
Mom got a new phone, and iPhone and has been playing around with it for like a week now. I have been practically begging my boss to get me one for like 2 years to know avail, but not sure if I want one now…
It's a nice, clean and family friendly place to eat. The staff is nice and informative and I think there is much to choose from and all the food is good. The only thing I didn't like was the stir fry station. I didn't think it was all that great and just will stick with what is on the buffet. I had a lo mein stir fry done and it seemed watered down and not very flavorful. I loved the Mango Chicken and plan on visiting again most likely during lunchtime. I'll give you an update when I do!
Henri, like Walt Whitman, possesses a great skill in handling the list poem and we will be looking at "Love Is" and "I Want To Paint" today.
So, you are probably wondering why in the world anyone would ever do such a thing. Well, there is a reason behind all the madness. The past couple months, my energy level has been really low, I had a lot of pain in my neck and lower back, I would get really dizzy and feel like I was about to pass out. Most days it was all I could do to go to work, come home, eat, then go to bed. My mom sent me off to see the chiropractor to get some relief from the neck pain. Oh those crazy chiropractors, they are up to more than just cracking backs these days.
A professional home inspection is critical in uncovering hidden issues. Be sure to do your homework!
Q: Are you a water pixie or land lover in real life? Did you make any excursions into the watery depths?
tallies up the final cost
Now, rewind that last part again: “add more weight or find another way to make that exercise more challenging for your body.” Did you catch the “or” and everything that came after it? Adding more weight is not the only way to up the stakes. What about bringing your feet closer together? Are you moving through a full range of motion.
There's another point to consider here, because I'm inclined to agree that the positive effects have been smaller than we ought to expect, and that is whether we have true capitalism or something masquerading as it. I mentioned this ten months ago while fisking Pol:When will you lot wake up and realize that you can't blame the free market because THERE AREN'T ANY FREE MARKETS BECAUSE GOVERNMENTS WON'T PERMIT IT. This constant fucking anti market whine (which seems to come both from left and what gets called 'right' these days) is like a spoilt teenager whinging that Santa didn't bring them what they wanted when they're old enough to work out that Santa doesn't exist.Call it capitalism, the free market, laissez faire, whatever, but what we see every day that looks like it... well, sadly it's sometimes something else, as demonstrated by this clip I saw at Obo's the other day.
As I get older and the patterns of my life ossify daily, I encounter that fear more and more often…a fear bordering on terror. I’m twenty-five now. But thirty is coming…and then forty…fifty…and so on, and surely–surely I will eventually hit that wall all adults seem to hit, and I’ll stop moving forward. I’ll settle into my awful suburban clapboard house, raise a family, keep pets, sign the kids up for swimming and dance and music lessons, maybe even join the local civic league and the parish choir just to keep things interesting, gradually put on weight, and try my best as the years progress not to notice that my soul has shriveled, that I never actually did anything.
Susan and Shelley,
OG 1.049
Pour potatoes from the aluminum into a large mixing bowl. Add milk, more than you would if you were making mashed potatoes from boiled potatoes because all of the starch is still in the potatoes and there is no added moisture from water. Hand mash until creamy, adding more milk if the mixture is too thick. I used at least ½ cup milk for my 5 potatoes.
I could vomit now, could fall to the ground and get sick into a beggars lap. But I hold it in. It’s just not worth the hassle. I could step into the traffic and become road kill but I don’t really want to ruin some happy shoppers day in the morning with the sight of me bones and dreams crushed within a puddle of blood!
We really were hoping that I didn't go into labor during all of this too. If I would've, there would've been boxes blocking the front door instead of hardware because we took all of the hardware back off to do the finishing work. We had a good chuckle on Sunday night, after the hardware was put back on, about our parents being at the hospital and asking for the keys to our house to go check on Kodi. We could just see us telling them "oh, no need...just move the boxes and walk right on in. Hopefully everything is still there!"
Now come with me, may it be so
“I’m glad I’m here with you.”
Distress Ink : Vintage Photo by Ranger
navy 3/4 sleeve dress - $18
CLEAN BLUE ASIA is the new industry standard for beach management and safety – ISO 13009
Before you go crazy about cheap phones being cheap and Tracfones being horrible (as you no doubt think all prepaid phones are), I’ll tell you, this is the cheapest service I can get for how much I intend to use my phone, and it doesn’t completely suck.
Traveling to Barcelona, Angkor Wat, Machu Picchu, Karnak. Singing in a rock band. Playing an instrument. Playing Beatrice in Much Ado, Martha in Virginia Wolf, the Chorus in Henry V. I am filled with aspiration!
Then I realized, it's okay to ask God for something big because of Who he is...and just because he loves me.
Hat
He’ll walk proudly on
4) Constipation usually is one of the causes of cellulite. So we have to make sure this is out of the way. Some of the old folks remedies is worth trying ...fibers lots and lots of fibers, drink at room temperature, chew your food well and yes no midnite snacks.
But to emerge from your cocoon
I feel like I'm a broken record lately because all I talk about is packing. Sorry friends, packing and cleaning has taken over every empty space in my brain. I have lists all over the house - I have lists about errands to run, I have lists about what to pack next, I even have a list of what's in the freezer, what's in the pantry and what's in the craft bins. I may have a list to remind me of where the lists are! It seems crazy, but the lists are helping my frazzled brain --- somewhat. Since I'm trying to pack everything up and I have my handy list of craft supplies, I realized I had rope. Yup, rope - full disclosure - it's clothesline. I had bought it for something else and the something else was a fail so here sits the rope in need of a project!
At the forefront of our thinking was how to preserve Mbeki’s legacy, particularly his African Renaissance vision and programme, his extensive attempts to end conflicts on the African continent and create the peace necessary for its development, and his leadership in the development of the New Partnership for Africa’s Development (NEPAD) and the African Peer Review Mechanism (APRM).
Some living, some standing alone
So here, in Part One, I'm going to look at putting plots together from the point of view of one of those young writers who often emails to ask me the immortal and much groaned over question: Where do you get your ideas?
A lot of times over and over, I fail.
Sixteen years is a long time to love someone.
would be a nice
Next, we need to cut up dead standing trees for the bonfire. These trees are usually young pine that died without falling over. This allows gravity to work. Most of the sap and moisture drain away leaving dry, ready-to-burn wood.
Here's what I plan on reading this week:
Events bring out character and the events involving David drive the film. This requires a clearly defined character with specific traits and sociopathy would have been the more appropriate choice but, instead, the filmmakers deliberately emphasise David's Jewishness. The events selected by the filmmakers show David's atrocious character and by now we have been prepared by allusions to see this as inhering in or stemming from his Jewishness.
One day he was good.
“No, and I don’t intend to,” said Olivia sharply.
All the Prophets said this moment would come. The Hopi say we are the ones we have been waiting for. We are the Bird Tribes, circling and massing, congregating for our shared flight through cyberspace, to reach consciousness, nay, communion with that all-pervasive force of the Universe, call it what you will. We have five hundred days to go. So, are we ready?
The bassist is Allen Whitman from The Mermen that took a side trip from Santa Cruz to join Joe for some noise makin'.
Grasshopper Camp does not have any water source on it. None. Without water you wouldn’t be a very happy camper. There was a very hopeful sign pointing somewhere and telling that water was there. It turned out that it was leading to the top of the actual Grasshopper Peak where the lighthouse stood. It was a nice view for some hills all around, a bit windy, but no water. There were some faucets here and there, but nothing was coming out of them. So we were kind of stuck. Luckily the weather wasn’t too hot (it was actually very cold) and there were water a bit down the road. We should be fine.
After we create our own worries, we then choose to stew on them in our minds until they create stress. We keep fertilizing our stress with self-limiting, self-generating fears, until we then manifest anxiety. We keep packing in and pushing down anxiety, pretending it isn’t happening, until we freely, willingly choose to have parts of our face go numb, panic pulsating throughout our entire body, until we almost hit the floor, or do.
It comes as no surprise that the Obama Administration put out a Statement of Administration Policy saying that President Obama’s senior advisors would recommend that he veto H.R. 5326 (FY2013 Commerce, Justice, Science Appropriations bill)...
After the movers had left, I laughed about it with my old roommate and we reminisced on some of the worst lines we’ve ever heard from guys before. Incidentally, many of them have come in our apartment complex… but here are a few notables.
This is a special one because it happens to be my daughter's favorite color combo and May 14th is her 10th birthday! I also think it's so summery and fun so I couldn't resist. ;)
Based on this it would seem that we could get the understanding of a maḍhab as being a school, following a certain limits of opinions on definitions and how to reach these definitions, following the founder or highest authority within those limits. That is, if we relate to the Shafi’i school, then the founder of this school of thoughts is Imam Muhammad ibn Idrîs ash-Shafi’i, who established the limits of opinions and methods on the definitions and how to reach them.
Twenty-six is way too young to sign a contract of ownership (even with a pre-nup).
There is a special pleasure in eating food straight from the garden, something that you have planted and tended and harvested, n'est ce pas?
Brutal death metal mixed with classical, meaning: never before has your face been melted with such elegance. Listening to this feels like your veins have been wired to an adrenaline factory. The filthy, ripped tuxedos the band wears in that video are very appropriate.
For those of you unfamiliar with Dutch Babies, they're like pancakes which are made in the oven. This particular recipe is made by heating the skillet with melted butter in it, blending all the ingredients in the blender, pouring them into the skillet and putting the hot skillet in the oven. After baking I topped it with sliced strawberries and dusted it with powdered sugar. It was super easy, the perfect recipe for a quick Valentine's breakfast.
I really do feel that communication is one of the strongest attributes that keeps a relationship like this running strong.
My computer died at a really bad time. There has been so much going on here in the Deep South! We passed Mardi Gras, Which involved many parades and the children's ball. I did a few Senior Portrait Model Sessions (they are so much easier than kids), made a senior portrait flier, had a few deaths in the family and one very tragic accident with an old friend from high school, had a car accident that only involved me. It's bad when Big Cowpoke has to say, "MOM!!! WHAT ARE YOU DOING?" Yes, I am loosing brain cells by the day!! It has been a super crazy week and a half.
Today I went with my family to eat lunch in a small restaurant in the outskirts of the city; there was a big yard and I found different animals: A squirrel, a turtle and some birds, of course I took a lot of photos of them, but while I was eating, I started taking photos of my little cousin, and I liked this one much more than the shots of animals.
"Ummm..."
There have been a few challenge sites close down and I am pleased to announce there is the EASIEST new challenge site just started!!!! You know when you scrap there is always a layout that you just LOVE more than the others.....everything fell into place, the papers , the photo , the embellies all just worked for you!!! THis challenge site is for those layouts!! Just pick your favorite layout for the month and send it in.....check out all the details here at This ones a winner and the lovely DT samples....OH yeah and one of them is mine......
maybe I should of bought
Greys will have a blue, green or purple undertone.
I don’t want to restrict grace in your life, but rather I hope to set it free. I hope to unleash the shackles that have bound you to a life of laws that told you you can only show grace in certain situations or that you can only be gracious at certain times or that being gracious in all situations is illusory. I want grace to be the principle that governs your relations with all people in your life: friends, enemies, children, relatives, and yourself. What I am hoping to do with grace in these sermons is teach you that you have been saved by grace and that, as such, you continue to be saved by grace each day. When God saved you by his grace he did not change the rules after and expect you to live by law from that point forward. If you have been saved by grace, he expects you to live by grace too. When grace is your very life you don’t need and won’t need my silly bullet-points concerning grace. When grace is your life it will always be your first, second, last, and only option. It is terribly liberating to live in such a way.
Spiced Apple Chips
BEFORE (side note: man, I need some color in here):
Keep your squares in pairs, so the front and the back will be the same. I would recommend this 99% of the time. On my last rag quilt I went completely scrappy, so the fabrics were different on each side, and it worked pretty well. But when it comes time to layout your blocks, keeping the fabric the same on both the front and the back will make things much, much easier.
I was in a changing room, in a public place, with awful fluorescent lighting. My skin was rippled with goosebumps, air conditioning in February. I was trying on jeans, daring not to look to closely at the size, but instead the way they hugged my curves tightly- emphasizing my structure. Despite the factors working against me, I looked anxiously into that dressing room mirror, and smiled. Jumped up and down. Wiggled and shimmied. I looked at my reflection in the mirror, and finally got it. It clicked, in that chilly room, with the noise of the public around me.
Formed in 1994
It wasn’t as though I had a lot of offers after film school and I had to admit it did sound like fun. So I went back to Mississippi and somehow we stumbled our way to victory in what was seen as a major upset. Then I discovered other people would pay me money to make commercials for them.
“What are you doing, child?” She asked suspiciously, frowning down through her cat eye glasses.
A simple quiet melody, it sounds like rain drops freezing into snow
I learned that good intentions and human flaws don’t always make a good mix.
I remember once that I was talking to an atheist friend of mine and he said: “Ah, Paul? He got mad, for sure he was unstable” and so on…
It is now my goal to open up to straight boys. To befriend them as I would girls. Obviously, this isn’t going to be an easy thing or an instant thing. It will be a work-in-progress. I can say with certainty that it will happen. Phases are temporary, just as this one will be.
I received a slip of paper from my son's school with a schedule of appointments starting at 8:30PM and ending at 9:40PM. Thankfully someone was efficient enough at the school to recognise my absence from the other super organised mothers. I can try blaming it on a number of things ( hormones?) but the reality is that they came in with one of many emails and went into that great email void.
Fortunately, I had an idea. I dumped the halloween candy into a mixing bowl and placed it on the floor next to the rocking chair. Then I handed LG his bag. "Trick-or treat to mommy!" I said.
Add a bit of ghee and fry pepper for a minute or two, until it starts to crackle. Keep aside.
Oh my god, Coke is way better than Pepsi…..it’s fucking black shit laced with sugar, get over it.
2: You do realise that it may take between one Andorra three weeks to fix though?
I don't want to tell my wife that part of what worries me is her. I nearly lost her to a heart attack last year. I honestly cannot imagine my life without her. And I know that she seems happy but the situation with her parents has been a strain over the last 8 months. I want her to feel carefree but realize that I can't make that happen. Her sponsor is dying, and she hasn't been to see her in a couple of months. I don't think that she wants to see the deterioration in body and spirit. I hate seeing her worry, so I do enough for both of us which is not a good solution.
It scares me. Not so much what she will say, but the fact I already knew that day would eventually come.
Last Sunday, while shopping I found some fresh plums at my local grocery store. So I immediately garbed some and that have transformed into these pops. We loved it so much for both its taste as well as its healthy too.
I tell you honey it’s time
and sweet anointing from above.
“Why would you stick your neck out for them like that?”
But depression was a common theme with people who call themselves assholes.
I love to be transported into an imaginary place
This has been a really difficult proposition for me to accept. I’ve seen the broad emotions that animals display, and the emotions of love and care they show for their young. I’ve seen dogs greet their owners after they come back from war, and how ecstatic they react because they missed their owners. I’ve seen animals cry in captivity, and calves begging for their mothers when their mothers are finally taken away.
Are the dreams they choked,
I am so happy I accidentaly grabbed two tangelos instead of plain old oranges when I went to Safeway to get the last ingredients I needed for this recipe. Tangelos are a hybrid citrus as a cross of a tangerine (yum!) and a grapefruit/pomelo (yum!). Tangelos are about the size of a closed fist and have a juicy, juicy inside at the expense of a thick skin. They’re also known as Honeybells.
As if Grand Pa leaving this world wasn’t enough, a massive hurricane, the Category-5 titan Frances, is headed straight for Deep South State. As of this morning it was on a course for eastern Central City (in other words, exactly where we live and our entire lives are centered), much to my dismay and internal agony. I prayed intensely last night and the Lord may have answered me, as the system seems to have shifted just a little bit to the north. I will
I like to think of this as the mid-life crisis Doctor. Half way through his regenerations hes saved the world enough times and defeated the Daleks and Cybermen enough times to become a bit cocky. This Doctor also didnt seem to care what others thought of him. This was also the first Doctor I was really exposed to and I must admit at the time I thought the plaid jacket was cool.
Cut to airless elevator face pressed against glass, the beginnings of hyperventilation and knees buckling....yeah, you're a regular Top Gun there, champ. The six year old next to you has more balls.
The day ends and she is skyping a friend. Someone comes in and smilingly informs her that there is zero electricity left on the meter. Well as close to zero as you can actually get. And the messenger then smilingly leaves.
As I talked with the older man, I reminisced about how the same brackets, and mirror, used to be available in any part store you visited. He looked at me and said: "You've been around too long." Since he's older than me, I wasn't insulted, although I did have to think for a few moments about his words.
Loving it, views right out to Christchurch City and the Port Hills in the distance, magical views at night.
Bio-Formulas Tonics
You can have this recipe ready in just a few quick minutes. It gives a surprising twist to traditional chocolate pudding.
Overall the food was fine, but far from spectacular. If you’re staying at Saratoga and want a sit-down meal (and can’t make the long trek over the water to Downtown Disney for many more dining options) you should be able to have a reasonable meal here, but I’d say the Turf Club is not exactly destination dining.
Full Disclosure Dept :
$0.70 off Kellogg's FiberPlus™ Cereal
Because this a God thing.
For thus saith the LORD that created the heavens; God himself that formed the earth and made it; he hath established it, he created it not in vain, he formed it to be inhabited: I am the LORD; and there is none else.
And we seem unable to reform
Tonight Barack Obama interrupted normally scheduled programming to discuss signing an agreement with Afghanistan which will ultimately pull us out of Afghanistan, and allow Afghan citizens to once more take care of themselves and their own country, while further protecting America and the rest of the world from Al Qaeda and the Taliban. While this is certainly a momentous occasion, I couldn’t help but think about the effect social media outlets such as Twitter and Facebook have had on the shape of modern politics in the last 8 years or so.
Strain the water from the dry ingredients through a cheesecloth. Discard the dry ingredients and add the water to the alcohol.
I am going to talk about.
Sahu was awarded here at a two-day national consultation on safe motherhood April 11-12. The nominations received from 10 high-focus states were judged by a team led by the ministry of health and family welfare in collaboration with White Ribbon Alliance and other experts on board.
During our lives we move from
If I had a nickle for every time someone told me they would LOVE to foster care/adopt, BUT...
Here he is, singing “C’mon Everybody,” as he sang it to me this morning and lightened my spirits and my step.
Women. Sheesh.
•Tattoo Mystique… The art and world of Angelique Houtkamp: If you fell in love with Angelique after checking out "Tattoo Darling" then you need to grab yourself a copy "Tattoo Mystique" as well. This second volume takes a peek into Angelique's personal collection, more full color reproductions & an interview with Angelique by Gemma Jones.
God is also going to turn our pruning hooks into spears. A pruning hook is used in two ways. First, it is used to prune a tree for greater growth and productivity. It is also used to cut the fruit from taller trees in which one cannot reach the fruit. This fruit from our vocation is going to be cast forth like a spear, but even more as seed planted to bring the harvest of which Joel speaks. Fruit from our work life is often the financial rewards generated. God wants to use our finances and everything else for His purposes. We must use our vocations and the fruit that comes from them as seed to bring the great harvest that God is planning.
#8 Krafty Karen
***Jake is back in Track and super fast. He is in Chiropractic care, so we are working things out and a little bit too slow for him, but Thank God we found him help. The Dr. actually said he looks like someone that had been in a car wreck and had whiplash or jumped off a roof or something. My boys. I know it is from all those flips on his skates and such. The Dr. is amazed he has even been running up to this point.
Little wonder that Red Tory is creating a stir. Here Blond is criticizing social democrats with their faith in the state, and Thatcher Conservatives and Blair’s New Labour with their faith in the markets, and all liberals for their glorification of the individual. His equation of Thatcher and Blair raises pretty tough questions about just what the so-called “third way” was really about. In short, it seems that just about everybody has been wrong and for quite a while now. And the solution: nothing less than a new politics – “the big society” – in which we recreate community and mutual responsibility, curtail the state and the corporation, and promote local autonomy and social enterprise and a shared sense of the common good.
However it is not the historic scenery or fine restaurants that lured me to Opelousas on my first ride of year. Opelousas is where the Louisiana State Highway known as LA-31 begins.
I am consoling myself with some Parisian interior eye candy...
I am the first, and I am the last; and beside me there is no God.
In 1986, following the passing of the Airports Act, the British Airports Authority was dissolved and all its properties, rights and liabilities were passed to a new company, BAA. BAA was privatised and floated on the London Stock Exchange in 1987.
Having gained control within the two most powerful means of forming opinion, they set about, first gradually, but later more rapidly, indoctrinating the western public with the aim of making them less willing or able to resist their eventual overthrow, whilst simultaneously removing anyone within the targeted organisation who did not share the approved ideology.
Therefore God gave them up in the lusts of their hearts to impurity, to the degrading of their bodies among themselves, because they exchanged the truth about God for a lie and worshiped and served the creature rather than the Creator, who is blessed forever! NRSV
"There are many dangerous threats that do exist. However, for each threat, there are practical preparedness solutions that exist, as well." - The American Civil Defense Association
It’s not enough to just wear a big hat, the whole event has to be decked out in Derby decor! “The Run of the Roses” is another name the Derby is known by, since the winning horse is covered in a blanket of roses. This is a great theme for a Derby party. Romantic, real, red roses can be used or DIY rolled, roses can be made like in the photos bellow. Hostess with the Mostest blogger wanted to create a vintage-modern event that looked classy, casual and fun like the Derby itself. This is the perfect way to throw a “Run of the Roses” party!
“I hate you! I’m your son but why you do this to me?!”
O how I love Jesus!
You get da real power,
3. Dan Post boots, $200
‘I’ve been in a world of hurt with Chris Brown fans lately…but, see, I just have to speak my mind because where I come from, beating up a woman is never OK’.
Well, aside from the many inspiring parts of the movie, there is one scene in particular that caught my attention today when the movie was playing in the background.
I'll deal.
Of course I know why I ignored the Atlantics back when they were actually making some headway into whatever there was of a late-seventies power pop market. Given how my tastes were being drawn towards a more...how shall we say...avant garde mode being affected into a rock 'n roll frame of being (see Clevo/Ako/Kento sphere of sound) music like that of the Atlantics just didn't seem to phase me in light of whatever Roky Erickson (who you believe me was just as "new wave" to mine ears as Pere Ubu!) was apt to be doing. And hey, I gotta admit that the looks of the guys as espied on the left wasn't exactly conduit to my own sense of sartorial inelegance...talk about new wave morphed into gnu wave (copyright 1977 Don Waller) and a fashion sense that seems to have been birthed from the mind of a fellow who walked in on his parents goin' at it age three and thought dad was on top strangling mom thus twisting his own sexual identity into something I'd prefer not to get into on this family-oriented blog.
What’s your favorite move in class? Does it change? I love the side leg series we use in long and lean legs, it’s killer, I love thigh dancing and I love using the blue ball at the barre, there is no way you cannot shake!
Nathan Cleverly is Britain’s only boxing world champion while Matthew Stevens and Jamie Jones have reached the World Championship snooker semi-finals.
Computer Programming:
No, I don't expect you to condemn sending a 14-year-old boy to stab a soldier - though I'm sure you'll condemn the fact that the soldier, bleeding from a neck wound, managed to fire his weapon to defend himself and so, I'm sure you'll condemn his protecting his very life by killing the Palestinian boy.
Moby- Animal Rights: this album is unique enough as it is a Moby album, but what makes this album stand out is the strange mix of ambient bliss and hardcore punk. Worth a listen to anyone who has passed off Moby as not worth their time. Someone to love: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u80TG_qVmKU That’s When I Reach for My Revolver: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UGiQhJBXMUI
Another thing to note. Always buy your trotters from the back end of the pig. Not the front. No joke.
Suddenly, one day the table stopped being set for him, his mail stopped arriving, his hats and coats disappeared from the rack, his footsteps were no longer heard and everyone stopped getting up to see what was taking him so long. Apparently he was dead then, without anyone being able to say exactly when it happened.
I began looking for events or teachers' associations the moment I started living in Spain.
Like it?? (I couldn't resist getting my freshly bloomed tulips in the shot, I love spring!) This project really takes longer to explain than actually do and the end result is an adorable "vintage" soap dispenser!
The wind hath blown a gale all day,
But to no avail - on goes the CD. Off sloped Boy 1 to the other room. Leaving Boy 2 who at first appeared to be making a fair stab at repeating the phrases on the CD - "Bonjour, comment allez-vous?, je suis en vacances, je suis de Londres", etc
Hasn’t seemed to scare you away completely yet.
I love Carrie's trick for using the decorative label punch for the main image. I figured out that to fit in the long side of the punch, the card stock should be 1 3/4" wide and it lines up perfectly. I also used the same punch to detail my card corners (I did this once before here). Instead of DP I added a row of stamping with the border stamp from the SAB set Fresh Vintage, and with a sentiment from Well Penned I'm calling this one done!
We had dinner with my mom's side of the family on the 23rd...we were really really missing my Grandma, Grandpa & Uncle Rob. Hallberg Christmas just doesn't feel the same without them. It was so fun to see my cousin Treena who surprised us all (mostly her sister Britt) with a visit home for Christmas! So proud of that Navy girl!
I had to take my wife’s car in today to get her oil changed and get her state inspection renewed. I am like George Costanza when it comes to cars. I know absolutely nothing about automotive technology and am thoroughly convinced that most mechanics know this fact and use my lack of a brain to try to rip me off.
It’s what makes chefs like René Redzepi (and many more) particularly unique in the restaurant world. In an interview in the Fall 2010 issue of Gastronomica Redzepi said that he would not open a second Noma. “I have the opportunity to be part of something special, something I don’t think I am ever to see in my life again, so I am not going to ruin it just to make more money.”
upon eagles wings
Barbara Baird locates historical precedents for the political and social significance of same-sex partnering, from colonial times up to the present.
Nothing really jumps out to begin with, little more aroma than a vodka martini (no I'm not letting that analogy go) but on tasting it's very much in the strong dark Belgian ale tradition, with figs, plums and similar dark fruit: think Abt 12 or Rochefort 10. It distinguishes itself with a dry roast coffee finish which adds a crisp cleanness you don't normally get in this sort of Belgian ale. They've done well here.
Isn’t that nice. She doesn’t like quotas, but she has no choice because she gave industry a “last chance” to engage in gender bean counting and they didn’t comply.
The chairman of arms giant BAE Systems has refused to rule out selling arms to the Saudi government even if the country uses them to put down peaceful protests. Dick Olver said he is “proud” to sell arms to the regimes of Saudi Arabia and Bahrain: here.
So there you have it, physical. In all my years I have never come back feeling like this, it’s amazing, wonderful and so worth every little bit (really big bits) of work I have put into my new life style journey.
Have a lovely day and I hope to see YOU do the day '10 Day You Challenge' as well!
I used Smucker's Rapsberry Spreadable Fruit for the glaze. I microwaved the jelly a bit and then dipped each cupcake into it. I let if dry before going on to frost them.
How To Make Beet Chips :
xo lamb
"Hi! You look like you're in a lot of pain," he said as he came to help me with the door.
This article will suggest some of the reasons why juicing with a Hamilton Beach 67650 Big Mouth Pro juicer is a good idea. I will also outline some of the benefits our bodies can obtain from regularly drinking fruit and vegetable juice.
"But Carteach, you already have a gorgeous Garand to shoot in the matches!"
Husband is trying to pursuade me to do so, but I know "The Truth about Having it All" - you can't.
“My wife always reminds me to be careful about what I say and write. But I know that whatever I write, there will be repercussions. I have always said that poems are weapons. I even have an anthology out called Puisi Itu Senjata but people don’t read it.”
Don’t you walk away from me blogger!
-our babies haven't pooped in almost 24 hours! (Go ahead, you can laugh. We have now learned that it takes a LOT longer than that to get a dr concerned...little Elliana is an every 3-dayer.)
I served these with leftover takeout rice and a salad, and I saved the leftovers for lunches – I bet they will be good cold.
The class was expected to use learn skills such as communication, cooperation, problem solving…to accomplish a task.
it is pointless to run
As some of you might recall, I got to visit the Baby Einstein headquarters in CA this past winter. I learned about the Baby Einstein DVDs and toys and how the company was started by a stay-at-home mom in her basement. (I love that part!)
We’re limited in choice this year
For today, I have my take on the current sketch at the Clean and Simple Stamping blog.... I hope you'll find some time to play along with us....
Court records show December’s petition was not the first time the woman had filed for protection. During two separate incidents in 2008 she asked a judge to protect her. In a Jan. 2008 petition, she explained her how her husband kept her isolated.
(At right, Rogers Hall meets the Jacobs Academic/Athletic Building at Jay Street)
... on the day that Moses (he of the 10 Commandments fame... although not yet, they come after this little bit of history...) led the Jews out of slavery in Egypt, it turns out they weren't quite as prepared as perhaps they should have been... history tells that they didn't have enough time to wait for the bread they'd baked to rise... yes, they had to take un-leavened bread on the long trip to freedom... and so as part of the celebrations of passover we remember this act of un-preparedness by eliminating anything everything that contains yeast or flour from our households and from our foods, ... this act of cleansing the house is reflected in many of the religions, including Lent where we cleanse our bodies and souls of temptation and has even become what we now all call the annual 'Spring clean' ...
Located in York County near the New Hampshire border, Biddeford (pop. 21,277) and Saco (pop. 18,477) were among Maine’s first industrial boom towns. The twin towns began a long legacy of cotton production in 1825, when Saco Manufacturing opened the largest textile mill in the country. Over the next quarter century, Saco and Biddeford both expanded cotton production and diversified into other industries and, in the process, was transformed into a leading manufacturing center for New England and beyond – a position it held well into the next century. As the industrial boom began its decline, mills closed, storefronts emptied and both towns fell into decline. Today, however, a major revitalization is underway, as massive brick mill buildings are being converted into office, studio and commercial spaces throughout the area. Saco is in the midst of a green revolution, including a new $2.2 million Amtrak station powered largely by wind and geothermal energy. And while downtown Biddeford may still be a little scruffy, it hopes to profit from a recent influx of artists and students from the nearby University of New England.
It's been a bad week. I screwed up again.
Following the natural theme, here's a tree for all the gardeners. Dried hydrangeas, red and green berries and sticks can be gathered from your yard (or your neighbor's yard, shhhh). Then add touches of glam with glass and bead acorns and pretty ribbon.
It only makes me more eager to get back to making entremets, especially now that strawberry season is here! I started to go farmers' market almost every Sunday now when the weather is nice, and I was so delighted to see that my favorite strawberry stall was there! Immediately I bought 6 baskets of strawberries last week, sweet and tasty as I remember it to be. I also found blueberries, and cherries! A little early maybe for the cherries, but hey I am not complaining. I also got those tulips from the most gorgeous flower stall called "super tulips" and they are indeed SUPER! So many good stuff floating around, I haven't even had the time to play with blood oranges, meyer lemons, now add strawberries and cherries to the list. But anyways, I'm trying to savor every minute of the wonderful days we've been having, although the weather here has been back in Winter mode again for the past week and rain too. I still hope I can get more free time in the kitchen by myself to play around.
Tenanted and leased division volumes down by 6.8%
He'd told me after rehearsal a few nights earlier that because of his last name, he would be sitting in the very last row of children that day.
In 2010, I was actually just as excited to see Iron Man 2 in theaters as my guy. While I didn’t enjoy it as much as the first, it was still a good movie. I actually don’t think the movie necessary failed, but I was so caught off guard with how fun the original was in 2008, that it would have been difficult for anything to live up to the hype.
Make sure to check references and view portfolios. Don’t hire someone who you don’t feel comfortable with and make sure you can afford their services. Read the contract carefully so you understand what they will and won’t do.
These mottos and all the stories surrounding them were the backbone beliefs that went into our immediate family. And there were lots of stories told of bravery, courage of convictions, and deeds of valor. One of these days I’d like to write some of those stories. Or use what I know as a basis for stories I want to tell. There were definitely heroes and villains and a good measure of happy ever after.
… one of the Command’s fundamental roles is indeed counterterror intelligence and disruption operations.
This Month's Read: Blood Rights by Kristen Painter
I just got in. A long blessed evening. My friend and brother in God’s work, Tim Dominguez. He is the one who asked for the Bibles. We talked about his Ministry. Ex Gang members who are working to spread Christ to at risk kids, drug addicts, and alcoholics. I listened and shared faith with a couple of members. We look different and have different paths. But the power of God’s grace and redeeming power was evident. Sweet dreams Angel…
The ice cream itself didn't end up having much of the rum flavor. It almost tasted like vanilla ice cream - however, there definitely was a kick from the rum-soaked raisins! Maybe next time I need to use a darker rum? (I used a gold Puerto Rican rum). I might also try adding the raisin-infused rum to the ice cream base earlier, and let that mixture sit in the fridge overnight before churning. Stay tuned!
"No." Demetrius shook his head and grabbed one of the stools from in front of the island to slide it around to her. He took her firmly by the hips and sat her down on it. "You need to rest and heal." His hands stayed upon her, and though she threw him a furious look, she didn't tell him to take them off.
Warning: below are 3 graphic videos from rebels who celebrating the death of Gadhafi. Considered disturbing.I know his death is a blessing to many but these videos are a little scary to be honest.
Brandon Weeden has a pretty live arm capable of making many NFL throws. I would grade his arm at being good but I would not say it is elite and capable of making all the throws, although he is close. The other thing I really appreciate about Weeden is his superb accuracy and ball placement, especially when defenders are around. This ability to fit the ball in tight windows is extremely nice to see as he shows an uncanny ability to make touch throws and drop the ball over the top of coverage and between defenders with relative ease. Not only is this a good quality to have for a passer but it shows his confidence in his arm and ability to deliver the ball into tight coverage. In the pocket Weeden shows good balance and overall footwork and seems to have a nice bounce and pop to drive the football down the field on intermediate to long routes. Weeden also shows great poise and composure in the pocket and in leading his team down the field, showing light feet that can get his body into position to make all the throws that are asked of him. Weeden’s ability to escape the pocket is just average however and he isn’t much of a threat to beat you with his legs, although he is competent enough in this area to be effective from time to time. Another thing I noticed about Weeden is that he is extremely quick in finding the laces and getting his grip on the football. This allows Weeden to get the ball out quickly on designed wide receiver screens that Oklahoma State likes to use often. When Weeden does escape the pocket and is asked to throw on the run he shows very good accuracy down the field. However, I did notice that Weeden drops the ball to his waist area before winding up and also shows a uneccessary ball pat that slows his release time. You can tell that Weeden has an extremely good feel for the Oklahoma State offense as he always seems to know where his check down receiver is. However, I have been saying for a while now that Oklahoma State utilizes an offense that doesn’t ask it’s quarterback to make many special throws or reads and it doesn’t hurt playing with a wide receiver like Justin Blackmon. This does not mean that Brandon Weeden cannot do these things but I do have my reservations and these are the reasons why.
The two begin investigating a drug ring run by Reese Feldman. (Vince Vaughn) Feldman has developed astrain of cocaine that is undetectable by smell or taste and plans to ship millions of dollars worth into Bay City. Our heroes ru the investigation from when a Feldman associate’s corpse washes ashore until the point the drugs are to be delivered hidden in the grad prize at a charity ball.
Join 3,302 other followers
During expo you could go up to the top.....I was 7 and remember it...such a wonderful experience...we had season passes....which was lucky since we didn't have too much money. We went down on the bus nearly everyday.
Today is Earth Day, April 22, 2012, a day on which we remind ourselves of the need to cherish, respect, and preserve our planet, the only home humanity has ever known.
We unlikely denizens of the third planet from the sun begin our mornings as we are accustomed: we pump water from deep within the earth for our coffee and showers, we might turn on the television and listen to the news as we get ready, and ride the bus or drive through never ending streams of radio, light, and microwave transmissions on our way to work, to take children to school, or run errands.
The sad news is that this is the first time in 8 years that I haven't had my ring on! I tried to put it on too soon after having Trail and it got VERY stuck! David had to rush me up to his work at 10PM one night and cut it off my finger. He's currently in the process of making another ring for me, but it won't look anything like the original because he never makes the same thing twice. He promised I'll have it by our next anniversary, and I can't wait! I hope the new ring stays on my finger for at least 80 years!
more actionable data, seeing where and how insights into customer opinion,
No one wins when people fight. And if this was an inquisition (what sells best wins because that means the most people are reading it and liking it), literary fiction would be the witches burned at the stake simple because they lack numbers. Does it mean the witches were wrong in their beliefs? Not really, because they believed it, so it was right to them. They just didn’t have the masses (sales) to stand up to the bigger kid on the school yard. But despite all the witches that were crispyfied in Salem and elsewhere, the culture and beliefs still exists today, though in a minority, and is very fulfilling to those who follow that faith (just like those who read and write literary fiction).
“Good-day pilgrim, how goes the machine?”
The most marked improvement comes in terms of the world building. After reading Armageddon Bound I mentioned that the events that take place in the real world, didn't seem to have too much effect on the regular non-demonic/non-angelic folk who populate the world. That problem was addressed and remedied to an extent in Resurrection, but Marquitz pretty much put that gripe to rest and buried it six feet deep with the events that take place here. This improvement is due in large part to the death storms that rock the world. What I liked best about this element is that it showed just how high the stakes are for Frank and his friends. The demons and angels are no longer just meddlesome pests that make Frank's life miserable, they are some extremely powerful beings that have the ability to wreak a whole shit-ton of havoc should they choose to and it's the lives of innocents that are affected most.
Once you are on the site click on "Mosaic Maker". You can register for an account, but I just signed in under my facebook account to pull pictures. I then set it to 7 Columns 3 Rows. You can also adjust the background & border colors. Then all you have to do is click on "choose a photo"
I'm working on another A2 size painting at the mo but as it's taking a while I decided to get creative digitally and created some wallpapers, a few years ago I dabbled in making some colourful fractal type images and in the past few days I decided to give it another go, here is a collection of my favourites:
Arno Engelhardt: Synthesizer (“Voodoo Dancer”, “Blueshouse”)
This card is a multiple....for our new Queen, Wanda, I cased one of her cards from her fabulous gallery, and it's also for the Free For All, to make a small tall card.
2 x embroidered handkerchief
Without you, none of this would have been possible. I do very much appreciate your help – and applaud you for your courage and bravery in not giving into the fear, and “voting with your wallet” for Disclosure with your purchase of SFI.
I'd have time
With some time ago, it used to rain with cats and dogs, or something like that, while now, in the ultra-wide projection range for more flexible in assigning signal space, and is not hindered by dedicated time slots. Many businesses are switching entirely over to VoIP communications because of an outdated or unsuitable communication system.
By 'free stuff' I am referring to items that you would normaly have to purchase with money.
As the stars that shall be bright when we are dust,
Go! I will protect you! Was the message.
Add the oats and flour mixture to the butter & sugar mixture. Combine well.
OUTLAWS is a completed 66400-word action/romance novel.
To where the damned have howled away their hearts,
I don't think I've read a book with a voodoo theme, but I did read a wonderfully scary, but not so scary that I had nightmares, book that resulted in me never looking at a doll's button eyes the same way again. So, my book for this penultimate day of National Library Week is Coraline by Neil Gaiman.
Really Random Rap Rivalries
~ Psalm 46
At Scotusblog, Timothy Coates concluded the following: “The Court’s questions indicate that this case may turn less on the niceties of the common law than the realities of common practice in the criminal courts. If the reality is that grand jury witnesses invariably engage in non-testimonial conduct prior to the proceeding itself –meeting with prosecutors, gathering evidence – that might spawn a malicious prosecution suit in which the subsequent testimony is admitted as evidence of malice, there seems to be little point in granting absolute immunity for such testimony, since erosion of grand jury secrecy and entanglement in litigation would occur in any event. On the other hand, if the Court concludes that potential liability for grand jury testimony may impair the day-to-day functioning of grand juries, and that there are practical differences between grand juries and warrant proceedings, then it could extend Briscoe’s rule of absolute immunity.”
Don't forget to email me for the free trial week.
Well I am excited to go to the University of Vermont next month for the study on preeclampsia women, so hopefully I will have some answers. And it is up to me to be as healthy and as active as I can before then. No excuses!
Further to my post of yesterday, I reproduce below the latest email from Prof. Pyszczynski. As far as I can see the first and fourth sentences contradict one-another!
If you have a tripod for your camera then set it up in front of your light box, if you don't have a tripod then add one to your christmas list! For now you can stand your camera on something to balance it.
Okay- Mommy Rant over! Thanks for listening. LOL)
As the light never seeps through the core
A mysterious shattered window on the road delays the second bus so it comes in last - giving the Feds and the Dixie Chicks a leg up.
Grandma did not specify how many beets to use, but this recipe is enough liquid for about 6 lbs of beets and will yield about 6 pints.
Well, its official,the giveaway is over and I one time got to fill out the form but it said it went down after I filled it out so I don't think my info got through. THat sucked.
1/2 jalepeno seeded and minced
After a brief interview with a student admission intern, another student gave us a tour of the very attractive campus. Here's the school's original building, Bentley Hall, which was built only a few years after the college was founded in 1815:
1272 **D-IV/13/1997. “Shakespeare’s Falstaff: A Socratic Survey.” Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2001(3), above, pp. 202-219 and in Item C-2002(10), above.)
You can’t make something out of nothing.
"A Gift is a tiny piece of the Second Realm, lodged inside the head of the Gifted. Most of the Gift-Giving process is concerned with making sure it is isolated from any First Realm-matter. One Gift by itself shouldn't be enough to cause a Sherim to form, but with a second..." She tailed off. Dimly, Rel realised he was letting himself be taken in by her performance, but he was too stunned to stoke his anger and rise above it.
The next is “Running Out Of Reasons To Run.” also by Rick Trevino. I spent my entire teen years running away from myself, not to mention hiding from the people around me. So to hear about someone who finally found the strength to stop running gave me hope that someday I could too. I keep this one in mind when I finally have the wild guy/girl finally meet the person they are meant to settle down with. It invokes in me such a feeling of surrendering without caring that they are surrendering, because they’re too deep in love to mind.
All sorts of (ridiculous) questions arise: how are their ‘human rights’ being violated? Freedom of speech? Seriously? Homophobia isn’t a right, anymore than bragging about it is. Claiming that there’s another side to the argument in the 21st century is just pig-headed stupidity.
Level of Tsundere: Marmalade-flavored shaved ice
Dear Nicholas and Your Future Therapist:
Turner’s art is far too unskilled for me. It lacks a feeling of substance, craft and passion. It is almost as if he progressed to a level of competency and then went ‘that will do’. At best it could be described as quirky, but it is mostly ugly and slapdash. There is no ‘eye appreciation’ to be found here.
Pants: Anthropologie
Director of Late Night with Conan O’Brien and SNL
C. Sins
The way "Cloud Gate" was made is very much in this Greek mode that Ruskin describes. The thing is a miracle of engineering, but no engineer's name is credited — it is an "Anish Kapoor" artwork. And the people who actually built the thing didn't get to make any individualized contribution to the way it appeared. Given the technical requirements, I don't even think this would have been particularly feasible, and I'm not at all sure it wouldn't have reduced the aesthetic impact of the thing, and its appeal to audiences. (There are contemporary public art works built on Ruskin's gothic lines — the Names Project AIDS Memorial Quilt comes to mind, for example). But what I'm getting at is this: "Cloud Gate" was made in a hierarchical way, with a controlling intelligence at the top and subordinate, servile, intelligences carrying out the actual production.
It was amazing how this book had a good plot line that didn't seem to base itself on the fabulous life of young starlets. Clea is a well-rounded character and the rest of this cast is so amazingly believable. My first thought was, "She couldn't have written THIS."
Deepa was sketching an angelic child
CATGUFFIN: a pretext for characters to behave in a way that might otherwise be construed as irrational or uncharacteristic, for example go wandering off on their own when there is a monster on the loose. (Alien, The Getaway (1994), The Tomb of Ligeia)
One of the survivors from the attack, Abdul Hadi, 40, said he was at home when a soldier broke down the door. “My father went out to find out what was happening, and he was killed,” he said. “I was trying to go out and find out about the shooting, but someone told me not to move, and I was covered by the women in my family in my room, so that is why I survived.”
I shall possess within the veil,
Tie: Superba (100% Dacron and “fully washable”)
Actually it turned out not to be too 'samey' at all and houses an interesting exhibition on whaling...
3) Some deco ideas for you to try~
Fold four 18-inch-long pieces of foil in half; unfold and coat inside with cooking spray.
Next year, we are goin' to Olive Garden.
I can talk night and day about not judging people,
We bought a bag full of goodies, moved the chair 4 feet from the TV, and played into the wee hours of the night!
This is the only place for the vacuum to go, so I had to put it in here.
Doyle considered this for several seconds then spoke slowly. “All right…but this had better not be some wild fabrication to get even with her for jilting you. I’m not above salting the story with tantalizing tidbits to make it more salable, but I do have a limit on how far I’ll go. I’ve worked too hard to build a credible reputation, and I won’t jeopardize that. Not for you or anyone else.”
2010.08.17 Pakistan Karachi 1 0 A leader of a minority religious sect is gunned down by mainstream rivals.
The English Reformers were certainly well acquainted with the early Church fathers and cited them in their writings. However, they did not read the Patristic writers uncritically as would the seventeenth century Caroline High Churchmen and the nineteenth century Tractarians and their Anglo-Catholic successors. They tried the writings of the early Church fathers by Scripture as they did the later Schoolmen and the sixteenth century Church of Rome. For the English Reformers the rule that had the greatest weight was not the rule of antiquity but the rule of Scripture. They recognized that the Patristic writers were fallible men who at times erred in their understanding and interpretation of Scripture.
- Well Ju-Ju Brush, Me and my cousin Party Time here are a little at a loss in getting together a little scheme we got goin down. Maybe we could get another head in on trying to devise a jumping off point for it. Why'nt you come hang out with us for a bit? Player Haters will always find safe harbour with us, ain't that right Party Time?
GUYS! I don’t know what you’ve been doing the last two days and frankly I don’t care. I’ve been too busy brewing potions and collecting lost Galleons. That’s right. Pottermore has opened for the masses. If you’re scratching your head wondering what Pottermore is, or you’re one of those “I don’t read Harry Potter I just watch the movies” follow these instructions carefully and immediately: first get your behind to a library. Next read every word of all seven Harry Potter books. Then reread them backwards (trust me, this is the ONLY way to do it). Bask in the glory of JK Rowling’s written word, and then weep that you will never amount to anything more than a mere Muggle. After you have completed all of these steps, you are welcome to snap back to reality. I will welcome you with open arms (figuratively speaking since I don’t really like hugs).
However, the ability of even caterpillars accustomed to warmer, more variable winters to cope with such conditions is still limited, according to the researchers. They calculated the energy use of both groups of caterpillars and discovered that the caterpillars that lower their metabolic rates to deal with warmer winters still use significantly more energy to survive them.
All these items were photographed straight after being pulled out of my bag, so they are looking a little crumpled and shabby. But they will scrub up well, and once I've had a trying on session, I'll decide which are keepers and which will go on Ebay.
Where do I drink and smoke? At home or at a Smoky-Drinky with other people who used to visit the pubs regularly. Three of us were regular enough to be on the pool team at one pub.
Jesus knows our every weakness;
I have had a bad case of the winter blues, the doldrums, cabin fever, or whatever you want to call it. Truly...between grey days and the drama of three kids with various and sundry broken bones and other orthopedic ailments for the past four months, I've really started to feel overwhelmed and underenthused. "Yippee...another trip to the orthopedist! I'm so excited!" "Woohoo! Another cloudy day...how cheerful!" Throw in a fender bender and the normal demands of life and I've been in a funk. I felt like I have been running from morning to night and with never a moment to myself...ever. I just bounce from one commitment to another until I fall into bed at night, exhausted. Did I mention I've been in a funk? Really funky. (Hey, I'm not proud of it, I'm just keeping it real for you all.)
Q: CHINA LAKE has non-stop action. What's your process? Do you outline or use any format? Since it was your debut book, what did you learn by writing it that you now use regularly?
$2.00 off on any Pure & Natural™ Product
“And never met the lovable man we’ve all come to know,” Luk finished. He paused for a second. “How do you know she’d even take you back?”
We take it in turns to host the challenges. You will be required to choose a challenge theme for your host month and do a little write up on the post (just telling people what your challenge is. Everyone adds their own pics and I add the sponsor info and inlinkz etc, so you will not be required to do any of that :))
Either way, the look on the face is priceless.
It is a very clever business that understands that detail costs. Detail and depth of knowledge is the difference in getting sponsorship and sponsorship activation right or wrong. Being remembered or just missing out in the noise of multiple layer sponsored events or assets. It was a red day, the start of a red event on a big red weekend for Virgin.
Balder. What's not to like?
The apple of her eye.
maybe that's all there is to it.
“Will you come to a discotheque with me?”
Wei squinted against the sun behind the warehouse trying to see through the windows. As he blinked against the glare, he realized that he had made a tactical mistake. Wei and his troops had arrived early in the morning as the sun was rising. The gate outside which they now sat was on the west side of the warehouse. The sun had just crested over the east side of the warehouse nearly blinding Wei and his soldiers.
Anyhow, that's all done. I told my husband about this blog and he gave me the crazy eyes. I have been reading blogs for about a month now and it is starting to border on obsession. These women are so crafty, so creative and on top of it they are super nice about sharing their ideas. I will tell you my favorites in another post. (Beth from above is definately a fave of mine :) But, hubbie just smiles when I show him all the ideas I want to implement in our house. God love him. He puts up with this :) But after I explained how this could keep him connected to us when he is gone and give our families an oppurtunity to see what it is like down here he agreed it was a good idea. Can you believe it? He thought me blogging was a good idea... funny hubbie :)
But if we consider history, something strikes us overwhelmingly – not the conflict between priests and military aristocrats, but their co-operation. Of course they have fought – and arguably the struggles between the Catholic church and the various kings of Medieval Europe is the greatest example of this we have. But their conflicts have always been against the background of their basic reconciliation with one another, their basic alliance. When the peasant revolts broke out, Catholic priests and warrior-nobles were entirely united in putting them down.
We’ll start with a hormone called Relaxin which is released into your system in the early stages of your pregnancy. Relaxin relaxes your muscles/joints/ligaments to help prepare your pelvis for childbirth, BUT, it doesn’t just affect your pelvis, it affects every joint in your body, AND, it stays in your system for up to 6 months after birth, which makes your body more susceptible to injury.
Once settled into the hostel, I got chatting to three German guys sharing my room; Christian, Tim and Mortz. All three of them are doctors, on a two week vacation road tripping from Boston to D.C. We exchanged stories from the places we had been to respectively and chilled. When they were getting ready to head out for the evening, I asked if they would mind if I would join them, and fortunately for me, they were more than happy to take me under their wing for the night. We headed out to Bedford Avenue, Mortz, who had lived in New York briefly, knew of what he considered to be the best pizza place in the town; Fornino. Once inside, I let the guys know that unfortunately for them, I was a vegetarian. They took this news surprisingly well and we enjoyed a meat free Bianca and a Calabrese with a bottle of red. While it was no Fire & Stone in terms of originality, it certainly turned out to be some of the best pizza I have ever had, and with some truly excellent company. After we had been shown to our table, Christian commented in German to his friends before translating on my behalf that he had fallen in love with the waitress. He later added to this when two brutally good looking girls walked in with two other guys; how nice, they brought their brothers he said. Brilliant, just like being at home. When it came to the bill, my new friends insisted that I was their guest for the meal and would not let me pay for my own food. Such gents I had found!
These candles are AMAZING. As usual with glitter, there's no way to capture their real awesome prettyness on camera. This was as close to their true nature as I got.
I was recently up in Auckland visiting friends and family. (Auckland is the largest metropolitan centre in NZ) And while this is all anecdotal, I was intrigued by the conversations I was having and the shift in attitude. People (most)were asking my opinion of the economy. Not specifically because I write a blog about such things, but because they are enquiring in a general way. To everyone they know I suspect. Looking for confirmation and validation of their concerns.
Owners often assume that blood in the urine is always a sign of infection. But as this case demonstrates, there can be other causes. Koji’s urine culture was negative proving that he did not have an infection. Also, even if a lower urinary tract infection is confirmed, especially if recurrent, there could be an underlying issue. Diagnostics always start with a urinalysis, but radiographs or even ultrasound is often needed for a complete evaluation.
They bring you an experience of peace or make you laugh.
Then there are the other life changes and challenges…. hopes and disappointments…. we all have them.
I think I see a movie and a book deal in the wings. Check out the video linked above.
Not so good.
This is to ward off bad spirits from the orchard and encourage the good spirits to provide a lush crop for the following year.
The Fire Next Time is a brilliant showcase for If It Die, to be released on 1st May.
Stamps: Squid, Sushi Nori Rolls, Nigiri Shrimp Sushi, California Roll Sushi, Spiral, Eat Sign, Smile, Vintage style hand, Bamboo Branches(Sideshow Stamps)
Although the numerical results would indicate Pierre Hermé won the Smackdown, it’s just not that easy. At the end of the night, four attendees confessed to preferring Ladurée overall—two of these were converts. Yesss!
This hair clip is a nice change from the huge flowers Blockette likes to wear in her hair. My best friend once refereed to Blockette as "Niecy," after Niecy Nash who has made it her fashion statement to wear huge flowers in her hair. Sometimes a you just need a bit of variety in your hair accessories.
The presentation, company and project were all well received. Living Earth, LLC, was in the running to receive the $10,000 grand prize, landing 2nd place.
bakers twine is unknown maker as I bought just a few yards at a LSS
Your comments on this important matter are welcome.
Yum yum yum yum yum. Seriously. Yum.
That’s right: some women who seek breast augmentation through implant surgery are not trying to get a show-stopping body, but rather are just trying to meet their own internal standard of beauty. Some women who have always felt that their breasts were too small, oddly shaped, or unbalanced-looking stand to gain additional self-confidence through implant surgery.
Now of course the flesh-and-blooders don’t wanna hear that at all. But I think he’s right about that. But what he’s saying basically is that the phenomenon is this whole range and that these things are just sorta quasi-physical. Well, that’s one way of looking at it.
Dimensions: 2.30″ h x
Doing more in a scene
Because it is like ducks brooding the eggs of swans. Because the silver apples of the moon are real.
If you’d read the books, or the profiles, you’d know that Obama attended Columbia and Harvard on scholarship. Most students at those schools, today, attend on scholarship. Several Ivy League schools tell prospective applicants up front that, if they are accepted, they will have the money to go. Even in the 1990s they prided themselves on helping bright but poor students.
Seriously about time, right?
I had to watch bits and pieces of his visit on the local news. When I first came here to Oahu I felt I had been given a new lease on life, Hawai’i is a wonderful place, with wonderful people. I came here to work on the Monorail project, which will start in Kapolie and run all the way into Town, and I was really shocked to find when I got here that there was opposition to the project.
Lisa's Bio: Lisa is a professional teddy bear artist selling heirloom quality collectible bears to Adults and has been making bears professionally since November 1997. Her creations have been nominated for several Awards including the TITA, Teddy Bear Scene Reader's Choice Awards and the Ace Awards. They've also been included on a regular basis in many of the major doll and crafts magazines.
As for a favourite 2000AD story, it's impossible to choose just one. There are so many. That comic quite literally changed the course of my life. But as an object lesson in the craft of story structure, The Apocalypse War takes a lot of beating.
See more about the History Lives series in Church History Worth Selling Your Silverware For. I couldn’t imagine not including this excellent book in our studies of the Reformation, so I am reading it aloud as we go.
If I were a decent blogger, I would have those pictures... but I'm not! Click here to visit Irini's lovely blog "the little craft workshop" and show her some genuine blog-love please! I also have to tell you, that I used to live in Athens for 8 years but moved back to Nafplio in 2005. So I also met up with my 3 best friends - Elina, Nikos and Christoforos - and that was so refreshing! I miss you guys, you know that!
This is why somebody needs to give the top wallies in Whitehall a hard slap, and very quickly – because while ironically MOR politics please the markets, they don’t do drastic very well. And drastic is what we need.
We dahnced. To the Bauhaus. To the Ministry. To the Sisters of Mercy. And on the "Retro 80's night" - that was still new, then, mind you - we'd get shitfaced and sing "Major Tom" at the top of our lungs. And we smoked and smoked and smoked. And we snuck in bottles of Rhinelander beer ($6.99 a case! In bottles! No shit!).
the outline of your life
Why can't I enjoy my kids like she enjoys hers?
I realised that with much of the policies, procedures and documents I had been doing for years for charities and now for the IT company I had actually gotten quite good at ‘Quality Assurance‘. So, I enrolled to train as an Internal Auditor with BSI and did a Customer Service NVQ through work. When I was made redundant I started to plan setting up my own business ‘Quality for IT’ providing quality assurance, namely ISO 9001:2008 support for IT companies. I then enrolled on a graduate program that proving training, support and finances to start-up businesses. I put a lot into getting the business set-up before ‘crashing’ again mentally (the business is ‘there’ I have just not taken on any customers, but I could always go back to it at some point…).
Thank you, God. He is fearfully and wonderfully made.
The perfect pumpkins would be on our front porch. Round, deep orange, corrugated evenly, and ready for carving. Decorating to complement the Fall mums blooming madly in terracotta pots, sentries at our doorway.
Monterrey – a city of 4 million, two and a half hours south of the U.S. border – is a Mexican financial and industrial powerhouse. It’s also the place where the Zetas crime syndicate burned to death 52 innocent people in a casino fire last year to avenge the casino owner’s refusal to pay them protection money.
And btw, does anyone know why my Goodreads icon has all but disappeared? Has this happened to anyone else? I'm about ready to kick its sorry butt to the curb if it doesn't show up and do its job on my sidebar.
“On Wednesday night, they planted one of the mock improvised explosive devices in a trunk of a car outside the temple and two mock bombs in the back seat of a car outside the Jewish center, the authorities said. Shortly thereafter, police officers swooped in and broke the windows on the suspects’ black sport utility vehicle and charged them with conspiracy to use weapons of mass destruction within the United States and conspiracy to acquire and use antiaircraft missiles.” NYT said.
langston said
I didn’t turn. The pain, which had now become a physically gut wrenching one was too much. It left me breathless. “What’s his name?”
Smashbox Loose Shimmer in Burlesque
Speaking of Heaven, we have to finish our Sunday breakfast before nine thirty, because Father Brown’s Mass is at ten thirty. Catholics cannot consume anything an hour before Mass (though I think when I was a kid the fast started the night before). Father Brown also has Mass at seven and eight, but I don’t think these times were devised for worshipers who consumed too many pints of craft beer the night before.
We had originally planned to hire some bikes and cycle through the park, but having both said we’d not been on a bike for years and the treacherously wet conditions we decided to walk instead.
..... W. B. Yeats
I am currently up to where he starts on Pool of Radiance which is a game I have fallen into quite a number of times. Speaking of falling into a game I will probably end up playing a few of them (like say Pool of Radiance) so I will either disappear for a bit or start posting about said games. He seems to have needed to take October off because of his job which seeing as the month is almost over I guess I found it at a good time.
MS: Also, they have a very clear sound, which is the opposite of strings, which have a more earthy and complicated sound. Out other instruments are metal, crystal clear. We had to have some kind of opposite to the strings.
Can be eaten right away, if desired. Or freeze at least 2 hours for firmer ice cream.
On 25 and 26 June 2011, Aerospace and Porsche fans will be at the air shows in Schwäbisch Hall in their element. Heubach fly out of the magpie, and some machines with PFM3200 Porsche engine in the association are to Schwäbisch Hall.
Pure gratefulness (and to be honest, pure terror) when I think of the responsibility we have been given to raise you for Him, and not for us.
Any questions? Send us an email at OneHourPhoto@armadafm.com
So, as you know we moved back to the US from England back in Sept of 2010. We rented a house in Vandenberg Village, CA and started to settle in to California living. Since then only a few things have changed but the best change was moving out of that house and into a house on Vandenberg AFB. No crazy landladies and a newer house made all the difference. So, here's our year in Review in photos!
Isabella met and eloped with Mac on the night of her debut, but while there was plenty of passion and love between them, Mac’s abuse of alcohol eventually led to their estrangement. With his brother Ian giving him a swift dose of reality, Mac realizes that his art is suffering not because he gave up drinking, but because he is still desperately in love with his wife (to whom he has been relentlessly faithful, thank heavens). When she approaches him with the information that there are paintings being passed off as his around town, he uses the ensuing investigation to insinuate himself back into her life and make amends.
Refrigerate the dessert a few hours until completely set before serving.
Behind this there is absolute coherence. Not around the law, not around campus health and safety, not around basic reason. The only coherence is this: If those who work and study on your campus gather together as a body with a political purpose, you will mobilize whatever petty and ludicrous pretext is to hand in order to beat, pepper spray, and arrest them. That is the goal for you. The evidence here is, we fear, inarguable. It cannot be misconstrued. Indeed the clarity of the situation and of your desperation is rather pathetic.
soy sauce, 2 tablespoons
I don't know how you sleep at night, with your decisions in Afghanistan. Now there is this, too.
With tears my eyes are misting.
But that's gone, and good bye. I don't even know how to use the new cooktop yet. Not too complicated, I suspect. Just a flick of the pilot, then dial up the flame of your choice.
In the Name of Jesus YOU have authority over the powers of darkness! Use it! Speak it!
I find the wee dresser very charming. It is well-loved and not in pristine shape by any means. It is thought to be from the 1920's, according to previous owners, but has no markings.
Over the years, we’ve all learned to love that phrase “squeaky clean.” It conjurs up images associated with a nice shower, a sweet-smelling baby, or our favorite soap. Unfortunately, what makes us feel the “squeaky” when we’ve washed our hands is actually not clean. It’s grime, germs, and dead skin cells trapped in soap scum on our skin! The culprit of squeaky clean? Hard water.
When morning came, Randi rose very quick,
“We had lots of song fragments left over from that initial road trip Gary and I made” says Ryan “and we thought, let’s weave them in and out of each other and make them into a larger body of work. We’d never done anything like that before but I really think it works.”
Night all, hope you have all had a lovely Saturday and enjoy Sunday just as much!
and, i will leave negative thoughts out. i will promise myself that i will breathe every time i feel like i am drowning.
But now all of a sudden they know it was a single guy, where he lived and when he was born.
Q. You shouldn’t wash your beer glasses with detergent.
And now we have Big Bang Theory.
9.THE JAGS - Back Of My Hand
Update: Neighbourhood blogger Lurking About SE11 has also picked up on the story. He notes a previous attempt to get late opening in a pub on Kennington Cross fell to opposition from locals. Lurking's call to action might be a bit too late (deadline for representations closed yesterday), but this one may run a while.
I try. That is all I can ask of myself and the only reason my self doubt doesn't evolve into self loathing.
At least I know she'll remain
In closing, some pictures of some food and some kids:
He didn't flinch and he maintained a visual connection with me. He handed me a bag and a notebook which I added to my cart, finishing off with "I appreciate it! It will help make the price of this eight dollar flourescent bulb seem more palatable!". We shared a quick chuckle and I was off to finish my business.
This scene speaks for itself.
In 1845, arrangements became more formalised with the creation of the Société d’Encouragement du Club Bordelais, formed by horse racing enthusiasts who were members of the exclusive British-style club, the Cercle Bordelais. The society later merged with the Société des Steeple-Chases de Bordeaux, resulting in the Société d’Encouragement de Bordeaux, which continues to run the racecourse to this day.
The ad's message was clear: Hondas are built with such incredible precision that they're always reliable - everything just works. And it's true, too. If there ever was a car company justified in making such a claim, it'd be Honda: in nearly two decades of manufacturing VTEC engines, with many millions of units produced, there has never once been a single engine that failed.
Council leader Triana Martell has returned from her journey through the mysterious wormhole, but she isn’t alone. She is accompanied by the ambassador of an alien race—the Dollovit. While the Council and crew of Galahad struggle to come to terms with the existence of the Dollovit, the ship begins to flounder. The radiation shields threaten to fail, damaged by the appearance of multiple wormholes. The Dollovit have a proposal for the crew: an offer of assistance that could be their only hope for survival. But their offer comes with an astronomical price. Beset with doubts and surrounded by danger, can Triana and her crew find a way to reach their destination—a new home for the human race?
Long before secession or a volkstaat could even become a viable objective and something visible on the horison there will be major suffering and hardship in this country. Long before a volkstaat could become worthy of planning for would there be civil war, revolution and mass killings in this anarchistic disaster created by the immoral liberals. Long before any of that would this country collapse economically and would our people be walking the streets like zombies hunting for road-kill while living off breadcrumbs rotting in the gutters. Long before then would whites be free-game, prohibited from performing any kind of work to earn a living. See South Africa: The Next Tunisia
Japandroids - The House That Heaven Built
Papers - Nitwits Collection- Great expectations and Bundle of Joy
Later, the GMT constant was bolstered by American linguist and anthropologist Floyd Lounsbury, who used data in the Dresden Codex Venus Table, a Mayan calendar and almanac that charts dates relative to the movements of Venus.
“I hate writing, I love having written.”--Dorothy Parker
Last, but not least was Kentucky... which was how he was announced,though it was not his name, just his place of origin. He spoke matter-of-factly about his past life in drugs and alcohol. He told us of his rehabilitation, but that it came with a lack of peace. When he moved to Dallas, he met a bunch of guys from the Village who spoke truth into his life and shared the gospel with him. This is where the straight-face stopped and the tears began to flow as his voice waved. "Jesus saved me by his grace."
We are looking forward to my husband's parents coming for a visit. It looks as if summer is returning for this week and we should be able to enjoy lots of time outside. Not too long ago I replanted both Dill and Basil for my father-in-law to use when he hopefully makes us Spanakopita. In March they were here and saw the very beginnings of the garden, and he also helped my husband build the front arbor. I'm excited for them to see how it all looks now.
I went a little crazy with the rings this time and bought a square wooden ring from Dethrose Vintage and a silvertone Modernist ring from another vendor (sadly don't know the store name). The little white ring looks to be carved bone and was only $2 from Weber's Antiques.
James wondered what that meant. For some reason he got the idea that Arnen was talking in code. But everything was so very confusing. The wand, the mysterious arrival of the Ashen, some secret about his parents connected with the Prince of Capria… James’s life was complicated enough right here on Earth without even mentioning the celestial bodies. Stars could go rot for all he cared. James fingered the black wand and again almost mentioned it, but something held him back again. With a jolt he wondered if the wand itself did not want to be mentioned.
* my job- I get paid to ask questions, learn, and manifest solutions to problems. Nothing better than that.
A few things though-the instructor is a total tool and being a yogaholic I don’t like the yoga set they do.
I’m just curious, do you call your 4+ year old dog puppy? My puppy is 4 years old and to me she will always be my little puppy. She doesn’t care to be cuddled that much, but loves to play ball. Just a quick tip to dog lovers trying to take pictures of their pets, take your dog for a run or play fetch before you take his/her pictures. They’ll give you a nice looking smile afterwards… Or at least you can tell people that. I read that tip somewhere and am unable to quote the source, sorry.
Day 7—Making Headway on the Bonding Project
Not only can I recite it because of constant revision and study sessions, but the magnificent beauty of the language and the wonderful, engaging story make this play a true classic.
BBE: (under the covers, in bed) “What?” (flaps blankets to augment the smell and share it with me)
The human brain is a magnificent organ though, isn't it?
Where's your writing achilles heel? Is it in narrative like mine?
Hacienda Luisita farmers seek reversal of SC ruling favoring Cojuangcos;
Blend coffee, ice cream and syrup together until smooth. Set aside. Fill 4 glasses 3/4 full with ice, add coffee mixture. Top with a dollop of whipped topping and serve immediately. Makes 4 servings!
Dried prawns, 1 tablespoon, deep fried until crispy
picked by Dinky himself...
* 1 teaspoon kosher salt
If you are uncomfortable in any way, don’t proceed with them. Companies need to understand that energy markets go up and down; there is no one size fits all and price isn’t everything. Alarmingly, many energy companies fall short of stated objectives, provide biased comparisons and lack transparency.
And fun activities at kinder for kidlets and Dads too.
Watching this gave me quite a few ideas for wardrobe…I’ll b able to test this out in New Mexico this April.
1 1/2c. brown sugar
Why did I enjoy this one more? For one reason, there was a deal more humour in this novel. We no longer had the poker-faced, quasi-serious delivery from Butcher. Instead we had the same delightful comedy moments that imbue his Dresden Files. There was one particular scene that made me laugh out loud, which is something to be treasured when reading a fantasy novel (I do find that sometimes they take themselves a little seriously!).
* link to the person who tagged you
Western Kentucky University begins classes on Monday, January 23rd. I will return to The Hill myself on the 24th to observe WKU's advising center and techniques. I've already had a bit of a moment with them by extension...they're doing what we call a transfer transcript evaluation for Hopkins. In his case, this involves multiple transcripts and several different course catalogs. I can physically lay hands on the one under which he was enrolled at the community college when it belonged to the University of Kentucky; it's from my freshman year and I still have it back in Smalltownland in the basement of the Chez. The one from the current community college system for his years of matriculation are in my office -again, no problem. The one from that place in Baltimore is the issue.
“The Greek words for burden and load give us insight into the meaning of these texts. The Greek word for burden means “excess burdens,” or burdens that are so heavy that they weigh us down. These burdens are like boulders. They can crush us. We shouldn’t be expected to carry a boulder by ourselves! It would break our backs. We need help with the boulders – those times of crisis and tragedy in our lives.
Stamping smiles for our kids, Karen
to thank you dear daddy.
I could quite honestly write an entire book about it- but remember how I didn't sleep? I am exhausted. I knew as I was leaving that it was going to be a life changing experience- and it was. I cried the whole way there and the whole way home and right now- my body tells me I just need to sleep.
Most of the people we have approached during the Check the Label campaign did not know dates are from Israel and also did not know that dates labelled West Bank or the Jordan Valley should also be Boycotted. Once they were told, the overwhelming majority of people were happy to join the boycott.
The only way to make the State recognise our power is to speak up. Let’s start at Bersih 3.0 at 2pm, next Saturday.
Our lunch table was in the bar area. Although there is a restaurant, it didn’t seem to be open, but the bar was full, mostly with pre-booked tables, so I’d strongly recommend booking if you plan to visit, as you could easily be disappointed. It could also be a bit of a disappointment if you wanted to just go in for a drink, as there wasn’t an awful lot of space that wasn’t taken up by diners! Fortunately, we had a really nice table with bench style seating down each side and lots of space for the four of us, but some of the tables in the bar area did seem cramped, and the whole place had a bit of an overcrowded feel – but on the plus side it had a nice atmosphere because it was busy. The Tollgate’s website, or rather a quote from Micheal (sic) Winner, describes it as “the quintessential English inn”. I do find that ‘quintessentially English’ is a bit of an over used phrase, but in this case it did describe the place very well – it’s a very traditional pub style venue, albeit the dining style, and the way that the tables in the bar area are set up, is much more restaurant-like in style.
If you’re buying foreclosures — or even considering it — be sure to talk with a real estate agent first. The process of buying a foreclosed property is different from buying a “regular” home. You’ll want somebody experienced on your team.
She called Seth’s number and got his voice mail. She left a brief message saying she’d found an abandoned car, gave the location, then headed back to the road so she could warn the sheriff about the sand trap.
I tried something new for this card. I made an Acetate window, so it was quite difficult to take a nice photo of it. Since the colors are what I see the spring blooms in, I am also submitting this to The Scraphouse challenge blog and The Paper Dolls challenge blog.
Last Friday, a friend of mine was heading to one of the few arcades left in our state because a mass music game tournament was being held there for the weekend. I used to go there when I was a DDR fiend and could actually compete, but my competitive days are pretty much over. I asked my friend if I could come along, since it has been months since I stepped foot on a dance machine, and it rather depressed me.
2. Randy Orton pinned Kane with the RKO 6/10
No one listened to my nay-saying, and their efforts to catch this clever little bandit redoubled. Finally one night this past week, they sat up in the family room until almost 1:30 in the morning, alternately watching a movie and listening for sounds in the backyard. When they heard the trap, all of them raced to the window like a distorted version of 'Twas the Night Before Christmas. (I opted for the sensible choice of going to bed over waiting for our friendly neighborhood rodent to make an appearance.)
Dole retains many of it 15th Century buildings in the narrow streets and the laneways of its historic centre. We have no idea why we went to visit Dole but we did and pleased that we did. It had a charm about it that invited you to discover its narrow streets. The town is beautifully presented or maybe it was just the spring growth that added to the atmosphere.
Row 8: Sc dec over first two sc. Sc next 2 sc. Sc dec over last two sc. Ch 1, turn.
The next character is a 6 year old girl. She is the daughter of a life long friend of my wife. This little girl was diagnosed with a brain tumor they can not operate on.
Heads down; eat.
was the title of the conference,
Well that’s what I think he said -it was really hard to hear with Matt Forte bitching that I was hoggin all the touchdowns, and Johnny Knox's incessant complaining that I was passing only to myself.
11. Sit Down Old Friend
11 - Looking Smiles
“Self,” I said to myself, “there comes a time when a girl just needs to read a horror novel. Now is that time, self.”
I woke to the mystic robin trills again this morning — she still thinks she’s a Hermit Thrush and that’s OK with me. A little identity confusion is fine. I have some of that myself…am I a goose? Am I a person? Should I honk or speak? Flap or run?
and they had a couple more singles I know nothing about: "Love Me Love Me Do" and "Dance with Me"
Over to you.
emergency is a house fire like I went through and
Honest—Abe, 6 x 4.5", $50 SOLD
2 tablespoons sugar, plus extra for sprinkling
Husband: Patrick Nerney (m. 8-Nov-1954, div. 1963, one daughter)
4. Earrings
Three WTK concerts in 1 month. Best idea ever!
There are a lot of different archetypes and for the art is you workshop we're going to explore 6 or 7 of them and look at how our subconscious interprets symbols in our art. The book itself is going to be three-dimensional, sculptural with a herringbone binding that will allow the pages to open to 360 degrees.
4) I should always always look where I am going
He chuckled at his bravado and stepped into the warm shower.
It is of paramount importance for us to actively search for ways of understanding those who have Autism that we regularly have contact with. As I’ve mentioned earlier, people with Autism are as unique as you and I. Communicating with one will almost definitely be diferent from another. We should take time to understand the patterns of their behaviour, know what triggers distress and observe body language. Our initial guesses may be wrong, but an active pursuit will go a long way.
Later on they passed the table on, and the next person did not like the high-gloss white, and instead painted it a matte black. Black's the color of night, and dark things. And just looks -classy-. But in time they grew tired of the table and passed it to someone else.
Despite of knowing who created this refreshing drink, I would like to know how can something so simple taste so good? A little salt around the rim, a blend of citrus fruit juice and tequila and olé! You have made yourself a wonderful margarita!
Like its predecessor, The Sower of the Seeds of Dreams features some lovely, lyrical landscape descriptions. Most of the novel takes place in high summer, and the rich beauty of the area that is now Gloucestershire and Somerset is brought vividly to life, from the salt-marshes of the coast to the vast reed-beds of the Somerset Levels.
It’s about time to finish this up and get ready for the party tonight. I’m looking forward to some fun and fellowship and to some really good food. My cookies got a little too brown on the bottom, but David ate two at lunch and didn’t complain, so I guess they’ll do. I’m looking forward to tomorrow’s lunch, too. My cake stuck again, so I guess I’ll slice it up. I’m also supposed to take a loaf of French bread, so when I go to the store to pick it up, I’ll see if I can find one of those disposable aluminum platters for the cake. I wonder if they have paper doilies.
-6 more bumGenius 4.0 one-size (in both hook and loop and snaps)
You could confess Face to Face which was like sitting in a therapist’s office only the therapist was dressed like a priest, or you could go Screen style, which was deliciously creepy and made you feel like you were starring in a movie about an Italian crime family or a Mexican soap opera. When I was a kid, I did Face to Face. As I got older, Screen. Not that my sins got all that crazy as I got older, but I guess I’ve just always been a romantic.
The sound of hooves pounding up Gravel Cart Road pulled the farmer out of his motionless stance. He reached the front door in two seconds and looked out to see Eli MacKennon, Jake’s striking nephew, slide down a dark colt’s back before the animal had skidded to a complete halt. The horse playfully reared up several times and spun sideways. He then lowered his massive head and bumped affectionately against the young man’s chest. Eli gently fondled the colt’s soft lips and simply pointed to the barn, where White Hand was attending to the other horses. The smoky-black equine with two white rear socks and a star, cantered away without hesitation—such was Cousin Eli’s exceptional gift with horses. Jake knew for sure that Ravenwood had never been ridden before that very day.
When the child would get bad enough to have to go to the hospital… they would of course get better being away from the source of poisoning….. but… the minute they returned home…. they began to get sick again.
8 oz Flaked Oats
At the entrance, the signboard shows the history of the area and identify the various mountain tops. You can see Mount Cook from here. There is also a cafe here to rest your feet, quench your thirst and slake your appetite.
Who would you recommend it to? Anyone who has a dog or who has ever had a dog. Anyone who loved “The Incredible Journey” and the movie “Homeward Bound”.
I’m not sure when a pond turns into a lake but this was quite a big pond, completely enclosed and artificially created I’m sure. It’s main attraction were the pipes that had been tipped there, big concrete affairs, wide enough to walk through and shelter in when it was pouring down, that tumbled down a steep slope and ended somewhere underwater. Who knows, perhaps there were more underwater than above it. Some kids would drag a pallet and a couple of oil drums from the local industrial estate and construct a raft but I was far too afraid of water at that age to suggest or agree to anything so reckless; I didn’t learn to swim until I was a teenager and I wouldn’t call myself a good swimmer now but I could probably save my own life.
a complete meal. (about 2-4 C)
“Vincit Omnia Veritas”
asked the President of the Board of Education whether his attention has been called to the effect of the competitive musical festivals carried on by private enterprise in many parts of the country upon the standard of musical training in schools
I always wanted to use the paramedic angle, but I also wanted to develop a series. Having a paramedic protagonist as the ongoing character was going to be a problem, though, because it wasn't plausible to have her rush about the city solving crime or going through some incredibly difficult and traumatic experience in each book. Detective Ella Marconi was the answer: she could give the procedural angle on the story, she could provide access to information about the case that the paramedic could never have, plus she was another point of view so allowed the reader a break from the shellshocked mind of Sophie.
So I thought I'd pass them along so that someone else might enjoy them too.
"Obesity rates among kids ages two to five have doubled in the last few decades," Mrs. Obama said. "More than half of obese children become overweight before their second birthday. It starts that early."
I am a raindrop.
died: September 11, 2010
That got my attention. No way I'm thinking to myself.
I was passing by one night last week and noticed a handsome crowd galavanting inside, as I approached with a small bag of groceries, a regular dude was entering and let me in. I looked around 180 degrees and connected eyes again with the regular guy who then informed me, "they're not open" he apologized as I walked out.
Especially from family and friends.
"The creation of the different cancer cards is therapeutic for us, but the feedback we hear back from customers who have sent on our cards is truly the most rewarding part. To hear how Vanessa’s insight and experiences have brightened the day of someone else dealing with cancer, or to know our simple and small card let someone know they were loved and supported, gives us such a sense of making a difference in the lives of others in the world wide community – and this is a key part of what our goals are for our business.
So, on the left side you will find the traditional carrot cake with cream cheese frosting and pineapple. It will betopped with a white chocolate disc painted like a cross section of a carrot. On the left is the modern treatment of carrot cake. We have taken the flavors of carrot cake; cream cheese, carrots, pineapple, coconut and pecans and have featured them in non traditional ways. The base is a cream cheese semifreddo, on that sits a carrot mousse and a quenelle of carrot sherbet and is topped with a carrot tuile. The modern treatment sits on a sea of pineapple foam with diced pineapple relish, toasted coconuts and candied pecans. Wow, I hope all that gets done and plated in time.
I stumbled through the door
Then, after I hung up, Anne went into a violent fit of shrieking in which she said that she wanted to slit herself with razor blades. She also started crying about being bullied as a child and Angry Man told her to get over it.
"As many as 100,000 children may be in home education; the true figure is not known. The vast majority are in the charge of loving and conscientious parents, but hundreds are at risk of abuse and neglect."
65GRAND
If the Bill was aimed at curbing foreign spies, why then is the Bill so strict in limiting the local media?
"Well don't you be thinking about trying any funny stuff on me?"
Unknown author
Praise God for His good and perfect gifts!
Following the "Crimpwerkzeug" theory, the senate judges that re-establishment may be requested even after expiry of the one-year-term
Summers in India are long and hot. So hot that the soil parches up and few fruits or veggies survive. Summer in India is not a fun time. Nor a flavorful time. But there are exceptions to rules. I still recall, with lots of fun, my school years when summer vacation was a time of well-natured 'stealing' for me, my sister and all the kids in the neighborhood.
She brings to those to love
- No real emotions
UK TV newsreader
Mass Action, Aleksei Gan, and the Social Aesthetics of Russian Constructivism
So long buddy, you will be missed - by some.
Act 1: Tatooine – World Pvp – Republic Level 24-28 – Empire Level 24-28
Biking, because that’s my primary passion. And yoga. And knitting. And shopping. Pet peeves. Culture and travel. So the usual gamut of topics that may or may not interest readers. I’ve been told I have a strong, humorous voice, so hopefully that will appear here. Once I become more adept (believe me there’s a huge learning curve), I hope to post photos. So be patient, give me a chance, comment often.
Thanks to Amazon’s US-centric approach, I’m even more excited about the Kobo Vox. I’ve yet to experience it in person, but from the specs it looks like a cool –and affordable- little tablet. It will have a browser and Android apps, and you can view the content you buy on other devices. I’ve experienced this on my Kobo Wifi with books I’ve bought. I haven’t been able to read magazine or newspaper subscriptions on my BlackBerry though.
The path is uncertain and there are bound to be obstacles..
There’s a song on our new album called Don’t Forget What The Movement’s Done For You. If you come and see us at the DDRofRnB on June 7th or at Marxism 2012 you’ll probably hear it. If you come to see us at the Tolpuddle Martyrs’ Festival you will definitely hear it. Until then, here are the lyrics, to celebrate this great day, and those that fought hard to get us where we are. Don’t stop fighting.
Yes. Stupid me. Thankfully, the frozen foods kept the temperature low enough that no food was ruined. (I had taken out a package of chicken breasts earlier that night, and they were frozen.)
“You certainly were, Bertie, it was extremely impressive. Quick thinking. Fast reflexes. I am so proud of you.” Reginald closed his eyes with sudden embarrassment.
And then Tara and I became friends.
13 Vo Ese - Rike´S Birthday
Each day, I just keep praying for this woman, and the family endorsing her cyberbullying. I pray that someday they will open themselves to the concepts of love, kindness, forgiveness, honesty, integrity, and compassion. That’s a tall order to fill, but with God, anything is possible! In the meantime, I will continue to live my own life fully using those concepts.
Problem #3: Things Don't Match
“I don’t care what Cal saw or what he thinks it was. Bennett’s fine and it’s nobody’s business. I have to go.”
Plot Summary: In early 14th century in England, a bold and street-smart (actually, dirt, country-road smart) urchin prevails through grit and wit. The main character is small and weak, but she fits the criteria of a hero. Often frightened but never cowed, Alyce knows what she wants: “a full belly, a contented heart, and a place in this world.” Only through fierce determination, trial and hardship does she find a solid footing. Alyce has just about everything against her that could be against her. She’s the lowest creature on a strictly observed social ladder: female, young, homeless, and nameless. She is called “dung beetle” or worse by everyone, is regularly kicked and slapped by her mistress, and suffers much humiliation from local folk. Everybody around Alyce cheats, steals, and abuses those lower than themselves. Societal ranking ensured that everyone is superior to someone, and that someone had better watch out. But Alyce has a more compassionate heart, and when she discovers one lower than herself, a runt of a boy barely 7 years old, she becomes his protector.
To flourish, these ground covers need to be fed. This is where soil disturbance comes in. Nature brings in herbivores on the hoof who trample decomposing plant material into the ground, pushing it into the root zone. They break up the soil crust and aerate it, making it more permeable to water. And they crush old dried stalks so that sunlight can reach new growth.
Avantika’s mind was now into a loop. She was stressed out. Still she could not refrain from thinking about it. Her phone beeped. It was a message from Bipin. “Baby, sorry I was not well yesterday. Puking n all. Did not even get a chance to check my mails. Forgot the cell inside my bag. Will call asap.” She thought of calling him. “Why should I call? He always thinks of himself. Is he so oblivious to my feelings? Or am I going crazy? Afterall he was not well yesterday.” Suddenly something came to her mind like a lightening bolt. She had logged into his account last night to check if he was alright. She was worried about him. But she had seen his mails being checked and he sent a mail to Gauri also. That had assured her that he was just busy. “Why did he lie to me? Is Mrunal true about him and Gauri.” Avantika had a friend in Bipin’s group which Bipin was not aware of. She had told Avantika that Bipin and Gauri flirt too much for a normal friendship. And that they are together most of the times.
Because you'll be marinating a whole bird, you'll need something big enough to hold it. I've used a brining bag and a (very) clean cooler in the past, but it was really only a small investment, about $8, to purchase a 5 gallon bucket with a lid.
So, I thought about it and settled on Beth Brown. Beth because it is my middle name, brown because it is my favorite color (unless it’s the color of a face mask). Also, you can’t get more functional/oatmeally/sturdy shoe-ish than a two syllable name like Beth Brown (no offense to anyone who might actually have this name—I bet you’re a hell kitten).
“It was a strange sight to see, they used to sew everything but now they look like film stars,” Binti, 17, said.
his knees and asked his lady, “Will you marry me?” She wiped
"Less measurable but no less profound is a sapping of confidence across our land- a nagging fear that America's decline is inevitable, that the next generation must lower its sights. Today I say to you that the challenges we face are real. They are serious and they are many. They will not be met easily or in a short span of time. But know this, America - they will be met.
Saturday finally brought us an absolutely shocking low-ball offer!! I was ready to literally lose my lunch when we were presented with the number. Our realtor actually already had the paperwork ready and waiting for our counter knowing it would be a given. To make a long story short we countered, they countered and we accepted. 14 days on the market and we are a few days away from a final sale. We have to wait out the week for the inspections and their financing approval so fingers crossed by Friday it will be a done deal!
4. You were a musician at MA. How did your experience here influence you, both as a musician and as a person?
“Know ye not, ye must be still, be very still for folding within arms so truesey!”
Reliable as usual, with only one segment (albeit a really good one): Poehler comes back to the Update desk to not only do another installment of “Really!?! With Seth and Amy”, but also to present some of the top stories of the week. My only small criticism was with the joke about Shakira getting attacked by a sea lion (“The story has to be true…because it was reported by Shakira’s hips”). The audience got it, then Seth unnecessarily explained the joke.
Again, the author could simply be using the family as a literary device, or he could have been inspired to use the messianic secret theme because of the real-life conflict Jesus experienced with his own family. It’s also possible, perhaps likely, that Jesus’ family – his siblings, for sure – resented his popularity, and that this jealousy would have begun very early, as they learned their brother was miraculously conceived.
23. Supraluxe-The Super Sounds Of Supraluxe (Self-Released)
Photo: The trouble continues on a rainy beach…
Between my weigh in and the time we left for Passover dinner at Uncle Petey’s in Queens, something snapped and I was all f@#% THIS dumb program! I’ll show YOU two tenths of a pound! And um…..well, that’s where the downward spiral began….
it would take to get to camp.
The protagonist of the book is running for the top position at the Bank and has to fight a rival to get there. The story revolves around this fight between two ambitious individuals and takes us into murky politics of power in Banking industry. But the beauty of book for me was not in the main story. There were many sub-plots and details about various functions of Bank which made it more interesting for me. There are two specific things which are still fresh in my mind about this book.
On the 3rd my Self-Stitched item is this light weight white top. It was made quite a while ago and I don't think I ever blogged about it.
i guess that is what i love about them.
Closely related to the post hoc fallacy is the incorrect link between correlation and causation. This fallacy says that if two things are related (or correlated) then there exists a causal relationship. This is seen in a variety of public policy issues. One of the most hotly debated topics currently involves the rise in the occurrence of autism in children and immunization shots. A high percentage of children who develop autism also received their immunization shots. The correlation between the two events is high. But whether immunization shots are the cause of autism is difficult to prove as there are numerous other factors that could contribute to autism. Medical studies have appeared to have disproven the theory that immunizations lead to autism. This debate will continue.
You Better Not Do That by Tommy Collins
“The failure to properly transfer possession of complete mortgage files has hindered numerous foreclosure proceedings and resulted in fraudulent activities,” the attorney general said in court documents.
If someone is carrying a gun in the open, then couldn’t someone who shouldn’t have one grab it from them? Every person who owns a gun is not an experienced fighter. Will the rule apply to everyone interested. I’m done with this story. This is the stupidest idea yet. Let us keep our guns, but we DO NOT need to display them publicly.
West Bay Corridor enhancements
In all honesty I wasn't very impressed with the Nagant. Pretty much as I expected. It will now be put away as nothing more than a cheap little oddity for my growing collection of Russian WWII pieces. The scarcity of the round and out of stock nature of the conversion cylinder coupled with the extremely slow and painful process of removing the fired brass one at a time made it a chore to shoot. After the first seven rounds I really didn't even care about accuracy at all and finally just let the three guys who were at the range with me by coincidence take a turn with it.
The lower abdomen is the reason man does not so easily consider himself a god.
Let’s face it, Balotelli knew exactly what he was doing, he went in studs high, and stamped on Alex’s leg. It’s a miracle, literally, that Alex didn’t suffer a career ending broken leg.
Pre heat oven for 350 F.Put water on large saucepan and let boil. Remove the outer green leaves of Cauliflower and discard. Break cauliflower to small pieces and slice up the stalk. Add the cauliflower to the boiling water with a pinch of salt and boil for 5 minutes. Chop 4 anchovy fillets and put them in a bowl with 1 2/3 cups of creme fraiche or heavy cream. Stir in 1 cup of cheddar cheese and season with salt and pepper. Pour a lug of olive oil in a food processor and add 4 slices of bread with crust left on, rosemary, a slice of smoked bacon, preferably free-range or organic. Whiz everything up until you have breadcrumbs. Drain the cauliflower and put on a medium-sized baking dish. Spoon the sauce over the cauliflower, and spring over the last cup of cheddar cheese along with your breadcrumbs. Bake for 45 minutes or until golden crisp.
The writing in Late Eclipses is top drawer, and I was so hooked I finished the novel in one sitting. I’ll be re-reading it again soon since I’m sure I missed out on some of the details, devouring it the way I did, but I just loved it so much I couldn’t stop to take a breather. I love May, Toby’s Fetch, for her drive to become an individual, for her sense of humour, for her ability to make Toby’s life easier and more complicated all at the same time. I also love that we got to see parts of Toby’s past come back to haunt her and how she deals with it the way she deals with pretty much everything – a little bit of fighting, a little bit of fumbling, a little bit of help. Late Eclipses is a beautiful addition to the world’s mythology, teaching us more about undines and Toby’s past and the Cait Sidhe and the nuance of court life, and also a glimpse into Sylvester that gave him a lot more depth and emotion. Is it any wonder that I force this series on everyone I know, much to their delight? And is it wrong that I want to kidnap Seanan McGuire so that I can know what happens next, in One Salt Sea?
Sources said Paolo has a PAN card in his name as he was earning money in India. “We had no idea he was doing business here. But he has a valid passport and visa. We have been maintaining his multiple arrival and departure reports,” a senior police officer said.
Take the drippings from the crockpot (in which you've cooked this whole chicken for most of the day at 300 degrees) or rotisserie pan and bring to a simmer in a sauce pan with about 1/2 cup of white wine.
But all of this pales into insignificance against the bigger picture. Go to the DFID website, hit the "project search" tab and then key in "climate change". You will get 301 projects, the first being the Environmental Transformation Fund, with a budget of £554 million, of which only £39.6 million has been spent.
Furthermore, the glory that now exists among the saints and angels in heaven is only a foretaste of the glory that will be revealed at the General Resurrection, when all the saving fruits of Christ’s incarnation, death and Resurrection are to be fully revealed. Adam, it will be remembered, was supposed to raise the first-created world closer to God, to make it more spiritual through his own spiritual ascent to God. Adam failed in his purpose, so the New Adam, our Lord Jesus Christ, came to fulfill it. His redemptive work was already accomplished with His death and Resurrection. But the fruits of that work unfold over time. As Christians we have already tasted some of those fruits, but we are to know them in their fullness after the General Resurrection. For through Christ’s Resurrection, not only will man be resurrected in a renewed, spiritual body: the entire creation will be renewed and become spiritual. As the book of the Apocalypse says, there will be a New Heaven and a New Earth (cf. Apoc. 21:1).
After he finished reading, I thought maybe he caught what the book was saying, because he apologized for fussing at me about the kitchen being a mess.
My Mums Craft Shop - Favourite song or movie - Butterfly Kisses by Bob Carlisle - if you have the time check out this utube video of the song its a real "Daddys little girl song" - as soon as I saw the challenge I remembered I love this song - the video brought a tear to my eye all over again - sniff!!
After some medication and special food Annie is doing well. The blood work came back all good too so at least we know she is healthy physically. Now, we just need to work on the mental health.
PAPER:Cottonball White (Clear Dollar Stamps), Sweet Threads (Basic Grey)
Has a Jesus-Demonstration-Sunday ever been tried before? Yes. A church in Nashville has a Jesus-Demonstration-Sunday, not just once a year, but every Sunday morning. This is called organic church and/or simple church. Here is their facebook page: http://www.facebook.com/#!/group.php?gid=63112196944
The BBC hate the Britain our fathers and grandfathers fought and died for. They realised many years ago they needed to eradicate Christianity if they were to destroy Britain from within. And they have virtually done so.
Hard to believe, but I am not the chic hipster you may think… but I know a cool trend when I see one! “The Artist Formerly Known as Prince” will be given full credit as the originator, but honestly, I’m just not invested enough to do further research. (This is solely motivated by my need to not look like an idiot in front of the kids.) I’m sure I’m not the only one who has considered a name change at some point. Who would guess that such common task as re-naming oneself would morph into an inspirational idea that would sweep the globe, not only of modern day but of all space and time:
Vietnamese Spring Rolls, this is REALLY good! Served with some delicious sweet salty sauce, yummy! There's another appetizer dish which we ordered, a huge piece of prawn crackers topped with fresh shredded veggies with a drizzle of light sweet and sour sauce , with cold prawns and squids, really delicious. I have forgotten to take the photo for this appetizer.
Today, I chose to get away from the house and concentrate on my studies. The location of choice was Panera Bread. All throughout the day, people would come and go. Individuals, families, and so on.
8 ounces fresh mushrooms, quartered
I figured this was a nice way for anyone who wishes to give them a gift to do so - again, please don't feel that you have to...but if you want to....
our illnesses reflect imbalances
General Michael V. Hayden, USAF (Ret.)
4 large egg whites, at room temperature
More pictures to come!
I am ready to do it.
The dominant ideology is “multi-racialism” and its militant wing “anti-racism.” These began as an ideological reaction to Hitler and the new Left replaced traditional liberals while adopting revised Marxism from such as The Frankfurt School. The opening of the camps had a massive effect on influential people in the West. The response was an inversion of what Hitler believed - groups he disliked became treated as special like gypsies and homosexuals. Jews were until their reported treatment of the Palestinians put them out of fashion again and now they are being persecuted throughout Europe by the nexus of EU elites and the imported Muslims. Those he revered (Whites) became the enemy of the ideology and the scapegoat if things went wrong. The other races being effectively deified can do no wrong: as in the Soviet Union wishful thinking replaces reality and their crimes are covered up!
As I said in early posts for The Fortress of Black Glass, this final book will be bleak and not everyone will make it through to the end.
Song of Solomon 5:2 I sleep, but my heart waketh: it is the voice of my beloved that knocketh, saying, Open to me, my sister, my love, my dove, my undefiled: for my head is filled with dew, and my locks with the drops of the night.
(Can I stick to my 20-odd regular readers, please?)
AGUILERA
And, underneath our heavy eyelids drooping,
"Hi there! We've got the greatest hits for you and more! This is a medium wave and this is instant and this is fast" Everything that you'll only ever get from your radio. Do you really think that any kind of music television will ever really last?"
We should ask ourselves three key questions:
The Heir is still friends with his friends, of course. There was no malice in any of it. The others never got together, even once, but the bass player with the borrowed bass said the drummer bought a third bass drum. Which is nice.
against an unfaithful nation.
Me: Um…actually I was talking to Lord Dormir
Heavy cast iron lids covered the holes but we quickly learned how to pry those up and look for critters inside. Toads, tiger salamanders, and a great variety of creepy crawly insects enjoyed living in the dark damp caverns of these water mains.
5) Smell the wine - What scents do you smell. Do you smell the oak or other scent that the wine was sitting in while it was going through the wine process?
The one on one concept makes learning at your own speed stress free. It isn’t a content or an assignment. You don’t have to go on to the next topic until you have committed the information to memory and or notes.
This fact has changed not only our way of life, but also the way we think, as flying with a plane is a new and unforgettable experience. Man is not made to stay kilometres above the Earth (or is he?), but he does it; even if landing may be scary sometimes, or presence the air cabin may bring some inconvenience. Nobody can say no to airplanes and in that way we are convincing ourselves that we can do achieve even more, that we may have limitations personally but not as a species.
The best thing when we play on stage is the connection that we have with the audience. We feel connected to them, especially when they sing together with us. It has also become the reason why we are doing music; we are able to connect with the people. We had a very surprising moment when one of our fans just suddenly did a b-boy dance in front of us when we played Ice Fortress. It was somehow shocking but we felt very amused seeing him.
Some Key features:
I could use-- well, almost anything to paint or stamp with:
Thanks so much for stopping by. I love reading your comments and I appreciate your scrappy support! Have a wonderfully happy scrappy day! Lynn
Ex-prisoner shares Armagh experiences with US author Fresh claims put pressure on Cardinal Brady HET review must be independent say victims’ families ‘I was only doing a favour’, ex-garda tells tribunal Supergrass link to hunt for McCord killers ‘A city of murderers’ Could Special Branch have saved lives of policemen? Collusion probe ‘is a significant issue for top republicans’
Making an effort to listen to clients’ objectives and strategize accordingly is timeless. Wants and needs don’t always match up – it takes an active listener to navigate that gap.
A puppy!
This doc is about a group which attempts to encourage children to be believers and preachers and to generally just follow Christianity. This is done however, by what can only be described as indoctrination. A great doc that shows you something different. You can watch this doc in parts 1-9 at http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rBv8tv62yGM
not deserving of this exclusion are excluded
One of the cards to only have one example is Ty Cobb. In an auction that ended in April 2011, that one example, graded in poor condition with significant paper loss, sold for $17,614.38. There are rumors of another Ty Cobb card that is in a different pose, but that has been unconfirmed.
I had to take several breaks along the way to guzzle water and to catch my breath and at one point had to dismount completely and push the bike up a “hill”. I couldn’t figure out what the problem was as I was doing 8 miles on the gym bike without having anything resembling a coronary. Halfway through I decided I must have the seat to low because there was no reason I should be considering calling in reinforcements on what I consider to be a relatively flat (at least from a car rider’s prospective) country road. So, I made the necessary adjustments and VOILA! I retrieved the towel that I had thrown in half a mile back and made it back to my AUTOmobile without having to stop once. I still have a lot of progress to make if I want to cross the finish line this June but I feel like I am on my way.
Mix beef in the marinade. Set aside.
See Job Description section for any required skills.
You can check in at bars, restaurants, department stores, highways, etc (Yes, I said highways). With these outlets people can even create check-ins for their homes with their address on it.
With NO Commute – so they get hours of time back a day. Let’s say 2 hours a day. 10 hours a week. 40 hours a month. (That’s a working week). 12 weeks a year! That is a lot of dentist visits, plumber visits, time with kids and spouse, time to nap, time to do whatever. And all this time was pulled out of the air as a result of not commuting.
Meanwhile. A picture from happier times…..ahhh.
Traditionally Fulham’s home form is good, which is just as well as traditionally their away form is rubbish. Newcastle haven’t been overly affected by the loss of Demba Ba and Cheik Tiote to the African Nations just yet, and during the week they added Ba’s international team-mate Pappis Cisse to their ranks.
It’s a great motivator: Validating your file at the end of the day, watching your page count creep up, making sure you keep on the target line for your stat page. All the writer’s resources are good too, and they’re there all year so you needn’t have to wait for Script Frenzy next year before you start your script.
Any suggestions for recipes? Let me know! xxo
One of my readers, Compassionate Response, left a comment below, copied from Western Voices World News, that is too important to leave in the comment section. I suggest writing a similar note or letter in your own words.
They were all dressed!
Investigation into the case is still in the way.
My sister who is a medical student was tasked to do duty in a mental hospital. By the time she came home after spending the night there, she had tons of stories of the different people in the facility. There was this young woman who thinks she is a man trapped in a woman’s body and so proceeds with walking around the place half-naked reasoning that it was what men do. Another man who met a girl he had a relationship with over the Internet was robbed and abused by the same woman and was soon contracted a mental disorder. Two teenagers were abandoned by their mom and lost their wits later on. And the stories went on and on.
Mateo was a dinosaur this year and Tatum was Ariel. While Mateo is SO laid back and a 'go-with-the-flow' type of guy, if he doesn't like something he will let us know it!! (He does not like the dr., getting haircuts, or the vaccuum...so I am thankful we have NO carpet in the house!)
Then I started thinking about what kind of clothing it is that obsesses me. Is it embellished clothing? Sure, I love hand-embroidered clothes, beaded clothes, clothes rich with handwork. But that's not it, either--I can go into any department store and find embroidered and/or beaded clothes, and those don't do a thing for me. Is it old, worn clothing? No: most of the clothes at thrift stores are just old clothes. So what is it? If it's not about art and it's not about embellishment and it's not about being old, what *is* it about?
To open the levels tool in Photoshop, click the "layer" menu then "new adjustment layer" and select "levels", then click "ok" to open the tool.
On November 11, 2011, he sent Frederick Hoff, Special Coordinator for Regional Affairs in the Office of the Special Envoy for Peace in the Middle East of the U.S. State Department, a letter to the President of «the Syrian National Council» proof pipe and a spokeswoman for the Council Basma Qdmana, it is proposed to them the following: «must both of you be aware about that Margilov Mikhail », Russian presidential envoy. In this letter, Hoff provides advice to Ghaliun and Qdmana, on the man closest to Russia, U.S. policy in the Middle East, and also the closest to the forces of the Syrian opposition and March 14 in Lebanon.
The tithe is the Lord’s. Even when we had nothing, she made sure to tithe what she had. She made sure we kids knew it too. She wasn’t doing that to brag; she was doing that to teach us a lesson. When you put God first in your finances, God will take care of you. She believed that. She practiced that. And I do too.
I did love this style of 'hair' and the truth is I have spent my life straightening, binding, pulling, ironing, ghd-ing my naturally wavy locks into submission....I have lived in 'hair prison' for as long as I care to remember and will no doubt continue to do so....I like groomed hair and I don't feel 'dressed' without it...A professional blow-dry is the best value of all for me...forget that it takes an hour out of the day or that it costs...it is worth every penny to have my locks tamed and looking reasonable. If the hair is looking good then all is well with the world....that's my mantra....
‘Sub Julio’ was I born, though it was late,
As Tyler Green is currently doing on Modern Art Notes, I think it is a great idea to name one’s ten favorite paintings if not for any other reason than to force oneself to write and post. Naming ten favorites is no easy task. In fact, the task cuts to quick about your history viewing art, who you are and what you value, why certain things affect you more than others, how art comes into even the most unlikely of lives and finds a place there. To name your ten favorite paintings is to tell stories, rhapsodise a little, shoot off the cuff, get a bit unruly, take sides, and most of all to love past cynicism, past doubt, even past belief. To name your ten is a shifting practice and rightly so, the numbers change, some paintings get bumped out, some get bumped in. The changing self, some things fixed, some things evolving. Here I go. They will total ten and will use Tyler's rule of being made after 1880 but they will not be in any particular order.
Dear Daddy Long-Legs,
On who the government was suspecting, the minister said, “We are not suspecting anybody. It is a security challenge but we are on top of the situation. We have the wherewithal to investigate the matter and we will get experts from anywhere to assist us because issues like this involve partnership”.
Without their leader Kane (their story starts a little earlier, good luck figuring that out), Nod has been reduced to in-fighting between the warring generals. They wouldn’t show you the execution unless this was you, the man who had to give up the coveted role of “evil Russian henchmen #7″ from whatever Schwarzenegger film they were shooting that year.
*We had to track down new long term daycare for Niko.
«McCann family spokesman Clarence Mitchell said: “Kate and Gerry are aware of this particular report from Spain. It was absolutely right that the police investigate any potential lead.
I worked on the book Bullyproof Your Child for Life with Dr. Joel Haber, and one of his key concepts is "good bystanders." Bullies thrive when bystanders stand around failing to act. It makes the victim think that everyone agrees with the bully's actions, and it gives the bully more power-- the bully now knows no one will intervene.
I think the thing that bothers me about this part of the Highlander Message is that I work around kids. I see kids with parents who are millionaires playing side by side with kids who come to school from one bedroom Section 8 apartments. And they like each other. Their hearts are still good, still pure and still unbiased. That's how it should be.
9) Ever had a poem or song written about you?
The story has a happy ending, though. Even as we drove back to our hotel room, I began ratcheting down my expectations. By the time I took my first sip, I expected something like a fizzy lager with a dash of caramel coloring. Of course, it wasn't. It was as intense as I recalled, if different. I remembered it as huge and malty, whereas it's actually a sharp dry stout (5.7%). It's got a luxurious bitter, equal parts tar and tobacco and a touch of sourness. I suspected that it was brewed with a lager yeast--it finishes out very dryly and there's not a hint of ester. Jackson says no, or did, a decade ago. The intensity is such that each mouthful pulls your attention back, but not so much that you don't almost immediately want another pull. It's not exactly a session stout, but it's in the ballpark. Two pints and you wouldn't suffer in the morning.
"Dragon’s Milk Ale, is a crown jewel of New Holland Brewing Company. It is the unrivaled result of painstaking processes - both creative and scientific."
This idiotic woman is once again involved in a public row with Levi Johnston. Apparently Levi stated during the week that he rarely gets to see Tripp, and he blamed the Palins for making it difficult for him to spend time with his son.
2 cans of frosting (used vanilla on the inside and chocolate on the outside)
Ahh...that's better....
6. Finally add embellishments of your choice to the cuff. I used white lace, a few mini pearls, and a decorative button.
Knowing You means that my soul keeps growing.
Big Mouse has a lot of work to do and really wants some help. Unfortunately, Little Mouse is too busy thinking about his dream to help. As the day wears on Big Mouse is growing more frustrated with Little Mouse as he makes daisy chains, collects clovers, and lays around thinking about his dream. Finally, at the end of the day with Big Mouse tired and grumpy, Little Mouse comes running out of the kitchen with a surprise for Big Mouse. While Big Mouse was working and thinking that Little Mouse was doing nothing, he was really making Big Mouse a sun hat! Big Mouse was so surprised the he was no longer in a bad mood. He realized that Little Mouse really was doing something, making him a special sun hat.
Be Realistic: You and your friends are adults with families and jobs and responsibilities. You are not going to be able to spend six hours every single Sunday playing boardgames or RPGs and expect everybody to show up all the time. When planning out RPG campaigns or boardgaming sessions, keep this in mind. Those games that take ten hours to play and require massive amounts of time and attention are going to be difficult to schedule.
Ok, well I am way behind on the Christmas season as far as blogging goes since I just started this, but let me tell you earmark this for next year or ring in the new year with a Cookie Swap as an afterthought because it is a great excuse to :
We'll be told how much money Hillary Clinton has raised, how Bill will give her a boost, and how great of a campaigner she is. Does she get the Democratic nomination? Watch the belt buckle. Hillary's negatives are over 50% in some polls. Even in the more favorable polls her "won't vote for her no matter what" numbers are in the high 30s. Essentially, she's juking and spinning, and she might spin down the field for a few yards. But she has little chance to get to the end zone.
Just when you thought you can finally dig in after all the effort… Wait, not yet.
I smiled, "Yeah, you think so?"
Ms. Reinke also said the initiative would build a more locally-based and self-reliant food economy within the community.
Black suits, bright smiles
"Cave In", for that matter, sounds like a track that fell off the master reels for Bitch Magnet's Umber LP, and "Cigarette Machine" could have spun off from Ben Hur. Really great songs, all of them.
For where your treasure is, there your heart will be also.”
In the past 7 days he has worked over 30 hours over time.
-Shea and Mr. Falvo
Silver City Brewing Co
He appeared, duly clad in little black hat, stockings and black shoes...he even had the characteristic flat footed walk of the bullfighter.....but instead of breeches he had something baggy that looked like a pair of cut down jogging trousers and his jacket was merely tinsel.
“Wonder what, young master?” Stevon inquired.
Timothy and I thank you from the bottom of our private parts.
Not “Why Daniel,” just “Daniel.”
Interested in Orchids? Join us for our Orchid Celebration, Saturday January 21st through Sunday, January 29th, 2012 at Field of Flowers in Boca Raton, Ft. Lauderdale-Davie, and Miami, FL. All orchids — plants, fresh cut stems, and orchid flower arrangements will be 20% off. Special events and demonstrations both Saturdays. Check here for updated schedule.
STOP PRESS; “Tolpuddle” now learns that Mr Wood will have to apply for retrospective planning permission after all. A note from chief planning officer Greenslade says: “My enforcement colleagues are progressing their investigation into the works to which you refer. I understand that the works were carried out with the approval of the Highway Authority but there is no planning permission in place.
Row 6- ch1, (sc in 6, 2sc) 4times, sc in 4(36)Row 7- ch1, sc in 3, fpdc, sk sc, (sc in 7, fpdc, sk)4times, join.Row 8- ch1, sc in each st.Row 9- repeat row 7Row 10-13- rep rows 8+9 twiceRow 14- ch1, sc dec, sc in 5, sc dec, (sc in 6, sc dec) 3times, sc in last 3 (31)Row 15- ch1, sc in 2, fpdc, sksc,(sc in 6, fpdc,sk sc) 4times,Row 16- ch1, sc dec, sc in 4, sc dec, (sc in 5, sc dec)3 times, sc in last 2 (26)
Marked the foundation upon which, your life would start anew
Of magic, and smoke that wouldn’t melt; but enchantingly swirls and swings!
Why would a case that could not settle be a zombie? I might have thought that kind of case to be the livest case of all. Except perhaps if we consider the law itself dead (?). Note also that, for Chesler, a Court disposition is a “lethal force”. Still I’m not sure I understand this metaphor. A legal challenge that can’t settle is a zombie-monster that the Court must slay? That seems a good explanation of a problem-solving perspective of jurisprudence – applying law to resolve disputes.
The story behind this hymn:
I was excited give the 100 burpees for time a run. A long ways back I did it in 4:52 and I wanted to beat it. We don’t do many burpees with Rudy’s shit so I was interested to see how it went. When my brother and I got to the gym, we went after it. (It was his first time with 100)….I was successful by hitting a time of 4:47 which I was pleased with. He was around 7:20 which is pretty good given the fact that he is still not fully recovered (strength and flexibility) from a shoulder surgery on a torn labrum.
What if we get broadband data without asking incumbents?
Is there anyone else who's ordered a blog book? Or maybe you've got a another cool way you keep track of family or house things that you want to remember? Are there any other procrastinators out there that wait until the last second to finish stuff? What kinds of non-house projects have you got going on in the next week?
And here's where I stop reading. The characters from Gilligan Island, indeed the characters in every television show are covered by copyright. You can't just use them in a book cause you want to. You need permission from the copyright owner. In the case of Gilligan's Island it's Turner Broadcasting.
Happy, excited, seasons wishes to you all.
So do not forget that. Meditate, or pray, and listen to the Divine Mind/Divine Voice/Divine Knowledge within you. There are solutions for everything. Sometimes the solution, is no solution. Making no decision about something is actually making a decision to keep things the way they are, no change. That is up to you. How you view this is up to you. The measure is your feelings. If you like how you are feeling, then change nothing. If you do not like how you are feeling, change your perspective or make a plan. You are in charge. No one else is in charge of you. How liberating.
It's Friday, it's the same flourescent lights I'm always under, same shops, same books, same time to kill. Panda Eyed Girl has flickering alive eyes, sitting as she does behind the layby counter of Big W where I work for 1nce up and about and alert, as if she's really swallowed a motivational lesson. She's explaining the refund policy in accurate detail to a single mother who's attention is instead taken on perving on 1ne of the stockboys. Panda Eyed Girl blithely ploughs on with her spiel, and begins to try and build some rapport with the single mother with an oddly heartwarming tale about bike and Xmas that you could probably read on her blog or her Twitter feed. I bet she's on Twitter. I might look her up. I'm surprised at her story though - it doesn't feel right considering she's normally slumped over the edge of a desk reading New Idea and passing less than well thought out opinions about Lleyton Hewitt. I guess I shouldn't judge. The stockboy has no idea he's become the object of a perv, and goes about his duties quickly and quietly. I don't know when people began looking so young. He's positively glowing with health where as I just look like a yawning coughing mess. I work with a Twittering girl - not that she's on Twitter, but she jibbers like she is, 140ty characters of inanity right in my ear every minute of the day. No wonder I look such a mess. Too much GBH of the ear-hole. Panda Eyed Girl for the first time looks reflective and mature as the customer pushes the bike away gently, almost pushing it into a standee in her gazing at the healthy youthful glow of the stock boy. It's definitely strange to think of Panda Eyed Girl being the mature 1ne of the situational moment, because I realise I've been flicking through a cheaply priced copy of a Yo Gabba Gabba book. I also realise the most poignant moment from my Xmas childhood was getting a trampoline when I was 6ix that ended up being an absolute nightmare because it would always give me an electric shock off the metal edges, and gave me a phobic tick which carries over to this day where I expect everything to fry my fingers. I don't think I was ever young enough to be perved on, although I was relatively clueless at that age as to whether people liked me, but I do remember the exact moment I went from torpor channelled through irony, from being young and disaffected and thinking my entire childhood was shit because I didn't get a video camera in 1990 to genuine affectionate memories being something I cherished. In that sense, I've suddenly had a connection with Panda Eyed Girl, and I would have told her that, if it wasn't weird, and she wasn't having to pick the eyes out of a ridiculous debate with a customer as to whether something was 18.99 or 19.99, a debate that for all I know is still going on, an ouroborous of debate unsettled even after the metal gates had clanged to the ground ending another Big W day under the Big W lights...
The earliest May Day celebrations appeared in pre-Christian times, with the festival of Flora, the Roman goddess of flowers, and the Walpurgis Night celebrations of the Germanic countries. It is also associated with the Gaelic Beltane. Many pagan celebrations were abandoned or Christianized during the process of conversion in Europe. A more secular version of May Day continues to be observed in Europe and America. In this form, May Day may be best known for its tradition of dancing the maypole dance and crowning of the Queen of the May. Various Neopagan groups celebrate reconstructed (to varying degrees) versions of these customs on May 1st.
Certain things should not be discussed publicly but some of the young men and ladies today have a lot to learn.
I tapped in some straight pins under the letters. Each day the girls will hang up a snowflake. My kids know that when we get to the word "Christmas" we will be close to actual Christmas.
An accident
The latest Fiberactions Reveal was yesterday. I wanted to show you some details of the two pieces I completed for the "split complementary" color challenge.
So. To sum up: not dead. Laundry finished? Not even close. Back to regular posts?
Fear of losing control.
All too often though, TLM communities seem, like any fringe movement, to be susceptible to turning inward and being captured by an extremist fringe; and some individuals in such communities seem more intent on subverting the good initiatives of others than mutual support. Some priests and communities seem to be doing good things on the surface, but when you scratch that surface...
Revan-ruan-hakik zimmer protonesan helium
There is only one relationship that matters, and that is your personal relationship to a personal Redeemer and Lord. Let everything else go, but maintain that at all costs, and God will fulfil His purpose through your life. One individual life may be of priceless value to God's purposes, and yours may be that life.
1" oval w/sentiment is from Bloom Cart.
We have lost our thirst
